⚖️ CS-24-01 | Abhimeet Sinha & Ors. v. High Court of Judicature at Patna & Ors. (2024)
Bench: Justices Hrishikesh Roy and Prashant Kumar Mishra
 Date of Judgment: 6 May 2024
 Constitutional Provisions: Articles 14, 16 and 21 of the Constitution of India

🧩 Facts of the Case
Several candidates who did not clear the Bihar Judicial Service Examination questioned the rule that fixed minimum qualifying marks in the oral interview (viva voce). They argued that it distorted fair competition—those scoring high in the written exam could still be rejected if they did not reach the oral threshold. This, they claimed, violated the equality guarantee under Articles 14 and 16 and contradicted the approach taken in All India Judges’ Association (1992) and the Shetty Commission recommendations, which had advised avoiding minimum interview marks.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
1️⃣ Whether prescribing minimum qualifying marks for the viva voce stage in judicial service recruitment contradicts the law declared in All India Judges’ Association v. Union of India (1992).
 2️⃣ Whether such a prescription amounts to arbitrariness and violates Articles 14 and 16 of the Constitution.

🧠 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court upheld the validity of the rule prescribing minimum viva voce marks.
 It held that setting a benchmark for interviews is constitutionally permissible so long as it is applied fairly and transparently. The Shetty Commission’s observations were recommendatory, not binding.
Ratio: Fixing reasonable qualifying marks in the interview stage is compatible with the equality clause if the criteria are objective, uniform, and aim at maintaining judicial competence.

💬 Reasoning of the Court
The All India Judges’ Association case never barred the use of qualifying marks; it only warned against excessive subjectivity.


Under Articles 233–235, High Courts possess administrative control over subordinate-judiciary recruitment.


The rule ensured standardization, transparency, and merit-based selection, which are consistent with constitutional fairness.


The threshold did not appear irrational or disproportionate to the purpose of selecting capable judges.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The petitions were dismissed. The Court held that the rule prescribing minimum interview marks for Bihar and Gujarat judicial recruitment was neither arbitrary nor violative of equality, and fell within the High Courts’ constitutional authority.

🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reinforces High Court autonomy in judicial service administration under Articles 233–235.


Distinguishes between eligibility (objective) and suitability (subjective) criteria in selection.


Clarifies that advisory commission reports do not override properly framed rules.


Strengthens the principle that fair + uniform = constitutional when evaluating recruitment policies.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
1️⃣ 🧱 All India Judges’ Association v. Union of India (1992) 1 SCC 119
Held: Judicial officers’ pay and recruitment standards should be improved per the Shetty Commission.


Significance: Laid the groundwork for reforming judicial service conditions and emphasized fairness in recruitment.


2️⃣ ⚖️ Syed T.A. Naqshbandi v. State of Jammu & Kashmir (2003) 9 SCC 592
Held: High Courts have primacy in appointments and promotions of the subordinate judiciary.


Significance: Reinforced the constitutional independence of High Courts under Articles 233–235 and limited executive interference.


3️⃣ 🏛️ Kavita Kamboj v. High Court of Punjab & Haryana (2023) SCC OnLine SC 1249
Held: Transparency and fairness are essential in judicial service recruitment processes.


Significance: Clarified that interview evaluation methods must withstand Article 14 scrutiny and maintain merit-based selection.



⚖️ CS-24-02 | Abhishek Banerjee & Anr. v. Directorate of Enforcement (2024)
Bench: Justices Bela M. Trivedi and Satish Chandra Sharma
 Date of Judgment: 9 September 2024
 Provisions Involved:
Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 – Sections 190(1)(a) read with 200


Indian Penal Code, 1860 – Sections 120-B, 409 and 174


Prevention of Money Laundering Act, 2002 – Section 50 and related provisions


Prevention of Corruption Act, 1988 – Section 13(2) read with 13(1)(a)



🧩 Facts of the Case
Abhishek Banerjee, a Member of Parliament, and his wife Rujira Banerjee were summoned by the Enforcement Directorate (ED) under Section 50 of the PMLA in a money-laundering investigation linked to an alleged coal scam. They challenged the summons before the Supreme Court, contending that the ED lacked jurisdiction to compel them to appear in New Delhi rather than their residential jurisdiction of Kolkata. They argued that the ED must follow the procedural safeguards under the Code of Criminal Procedure and that the PMLA does not expressly override those provisions.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
1️⃣ Whether the ED can summon persons under Section 50 of the PMLA to appear outside their residential jurisdiction.
 2️⃣ Whether the CrPC applies to proceedings under the PMLA in the absence of specific procedure in the Act.
 3️⃣ Whether the ED’s powers under Section 50 infringe the constitutional rights to life and personal liberty under Article 21.

🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court dismissed the petition and upheld the ED’s authority to issue summons under Section 50 of the PMLA irrespective of territorial boundaries. It held that the PMLA is a special, self-contained law whose provisions override the CrPC whenever inconsistencies arise. Section 71 of the PMLA expressly gives it an overriding effect. The Court reiterated that the power to summon for inquiry under Section 50 does not violate fundamental rights, as such summons do not amount to compulsion to incriminate oneself.
Ratio: The PMLA being a special enactment prevails over the CrPC, and the ED may summon any person for inquiry at any place connected to the investigation so long as nexus exists with the alleged offence.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court relied on the principle that special laws override general laws to resolve conflicts between PMLA and CrPC.


Section 50 of PMLA creates an independent mechanism for enforcement and investigation, distinct from the police investigation process under Chapter XII of CrPC.


The Court found sufficient territorial connection between Delhi and the alleged financial transactions to justify the ED’s jurisdiction.


Article 20(3) (protection against self-incrimination) was held inapplicable since the summons were part of an inquiry, not a criminal trial.


The Court stressed that procedural compliance under the PMLA is a statutory requirement, and its officers are bound by the Act rather than the CrPC.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The appeal was dismissed. The ED’s summons were held to be valid, non-arbitrary, and within the scope of its statutory powers. The Court affirmed that PMLA procedures take precedence over CrPC wherever they conflict.

🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Clarifies that PMLA procedures override CrPC in cases of overlap or inconsistency.


Reinforces the concept of PMLA as a self-contained code with independent investigative authority.


Narrows the scope of territorial jurisdiction challenges to ED summons.


Emphasizes that Article 20(3) rights do not apply at the summons stage.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
1️⃣ Vijay Madanlal Choudhary v. Union of India (2022)
Held: PMLA is a complete and self-contained code with its own procedures that override CrPC provisions where inconsistent.


Significance: Provided the legal foundation for the Court’s view that ED summons under Section 50 are not subject to CrPC’s territorial limits or investigation norms.


2️⃣ Tofan Singh v. State of Tamil Nadu (2020)
Held: Statements made to officers under certain special statutes may be inadmissible if they amount to confessional statements to police.


Significance: Helped distinguish the nature of ED officers under PMLA from ordinary police officers, justifying the Court’s finding that Section 50 inquiries are not criminal investigations.


3️⃣ Nikesh Tarachand Shah v. Union of India (2018)
Held: Earlier bail provisions of PMLA violated Articles 14 and 21 but were later rectified by amendment.


Significance: Reinforces the Court’s view that constitutional rights must coexist with PMLA’s stringent framework without diluting its special status.
Here is the case summary for CS-24-03 | Achin Gupta v. State of Haryana & Ors. (2024), prepared in the agreed format with copyright-safe phrasing and enhanced readability.

⚖️ CS-24-03 | Achin Gupta v. State of Haryana & Ors. (2024)
Bench: Justices J.B. Pardiwala & Manoj Misra
 Date of Judgment: 3 May 2024
 Key Statutes / Provisions:
Indian Penal Code, 1860 –


Section 323: Punishment for voluntarily causing hurt


Section 406: Criminal breach of trust


Section 498A: Cruelty by husband or relatives of husband


Section 506: Criminal intimidation


Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 – Section 482 (inherent powers of the High Court to prevent abuse of process)


Constitution of India – Articles 14 and 21 (right to equality and personal liberty)



🧩 Facts of the Case
The appellant, Achin Gupta, married the complainant in 2008. In 2019, Gupta filed for divorce, and in 2020, his mother lodged a domestic-violence complaint. Two years later, in April 2021, the complainant filed an FIR under Sections 323, 406, 498A, and 506 of the IPC alleging dowry harassment, physical abuse, and threats. The appellant contended that the FIR was retaliatory and vague, filed as a counter-blast to his divorce proceedings. The Punjab & Haryana High Court declined to quash the FIR under Section 482 CrPC, prompting the appeal to the Supreme Court.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
1️⃣ Whether the High Court erred in refusing to exercise its inherent power under Section 482 CrPC to quash the proceedings.
 2️⃣ Whether the FIR disclosed specific, cognizable offences or was a misuse of the criminal process arising out of matrimonial discord.
 3️⃣ Whether continuation of such proceedings amounted to harassment and abuse of process.

🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court allowed the appeal and quashed the criminal proceedings. It held that the FIR contained generalised and omnibus allegations without particular details of cruelty or demand. Such sweeping statements, without supporting material, warranted intervention under Section 482 CrPC.
Ratio: Courts must carefully examine matrimonial complaints under Section 498A and related offences to ensure that the criminal process is not used as a weapon of retaliation or coercion.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court observed that the complaint was lodged two years after divorce proceedings began, which raised serious doubts about its bona fides.


No specific acts, dates, or instances of cruelty or breach of trust were cited, showing absence of prima facie evidence.


Relying on Bhajan Lal and Preeti Gupta, the Court reiterated that vague allegations and delay may justify quashing.


It cautioned that unverified allegations under Section 498A IPC often result in undue harassment and social stigma.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court quashed FIR No. 95 of 2021 and all related criminal proceedings, holding them to be an abuse of process. It also directed that a copy of the judgment be sent to the Ministry of Home Affairs and the Ministry of Law for consideration of appropriate legislative reforms to curb misuse of Section 498A IPC.

🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reinforces judicial power under Section 482 CrPC to prevent misuse of criminal law.


Recognises increasing misuse of Section 498A in matrimonial conflicts and calls for legislative review.


Stresses that specific, credible allegations are essential before initiating prosecution.


Balances protection of women with safeguards against false or vindictive litigation.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
1️⃣ State of Haryana v. Bhajan Lal (1992)
Held: Listed illustrative categories where FIRs may be quashed if they lack substance or indicate mala fide intent
No offence disclosed: Where the allegations made in the FIR or complaint, even if taken at face value and accepted in their entirety, do not constitute any offence or make out a case against the accused.
Absence of cognizable offence: Where the allegations do not disclose a cognizable offence, justifying investigation by police under Section 156(1) CrPC.
Uncontroverted allegations and evidence fail to prove offence: Where the uncontroverted allegations and the evidence collected in support do not disclose the commission of any offence.
Allegations absurd or inherently improbable: Where the allegations in the FIR are so absurd and inherently improbable that no prudent person could ever reach a conclusion that there is sufficient ground for proceeding.
Lack of legal bar ignored: Where there exists an express legal bar in the Code or in any other law to the institution or continuance of proceedings (for example, prior sanction requirements).
Malicious or mala fide proceedings: Where the proceedings are manifestly attended with mala fide and/or instituted maliciously with an ulterior motive for wreaking vengeance on the accused.
Civil dispute cloaked as criminal case: Where the dispute is predominantly civil or contractual in nature, but has been given a criminal colour merely to exert pressure or settle personal scores.
Significance: These categories serve as guiding principles (not exhaustive) for the exercise of the High Court’s inherent power under Section 482 CrPC to prevent abuse of process of law and to secure the ends of justice — a doctrine reaffirmed repeatedly in cases like Achin Gupta v. State of Haryana (2024) and Neeharika Infrastructure (2021).


2️⃣ Preeti Gupta v. State of Jharkhand (2010)
Held: Courts must be cautious of exaggerated allegations in matrimonial cases under Section 498A.


Significance: Warned against mechanical prosecution in family disputes.


3️⃣ Arnesh Kumar v. State of Bihar (2014)
Held: Issued guidelines for arrest under Section 498A to prevent unnecessary detention.


Significance: Reinforced judicial safeguards against misuse of dowry-harassment provisions.



⚖️ CS-24-04 | Association for Democratic Reforms & Anr. v. Union of India & Ors. (2024)
Bench: Five-Judge Constitution Bench of the Supreme Court of India, led by Chief Justice D.Y. Chandrachud
 Date of Judgment: 15 February 2024
 Key Constitutional Provisions: Articles 19(1)(a) (Freedom of speech and expression) & 21 (Right to life and personal liberty)
 Key Statutory Scheme: Electoral Bonds Scheme, 2018

🧩 Facts of the Case
The petitioners, including the NGO Association for Democratic Reforms (ADR), challenged the validity of the Electoral Bonds Scheme introduced by the Government of India in 2018. Under this scheme, individuals and corporations could purchase bonds anonymously and donate them to political parties, with donor identity not disclosed publicly. The petitioners argued the scheme violated the voters’ right to information and democratic accountability, as it concealed the source of political funding and potentially enabled undue influence.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the Electoral Bonds Scheme violated the voters’ right to information under Article 19(1)(a).


Whether the anonymity of political donations under the scheme undermined the democratic process and equality of citizens under Article 14.


Whether the scheme’s objectives—such as curbing black money—justified the restrictions on donor transparency and disclosure.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court struck down the Electoral Bonds Scheme as unconstitutional. The Court held that the scheme’s anonymity feature deprived citizens of crucial information about political funding, thereby impinging their right to free speech and meaningful participation in elections. The scheme failed to meet the test of proportionality because the restriction on donor identity disclosure was neither justifiable nor the least restrictive means.
Ratio: A law regulating political funding must preserve transparency and enable voters to make informed choices — anonymous donations that obscure funding sources violate Article 19(1)(a) and undermine democratic fairness.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court held that free speech includes the right to receive information, especially when funding of political parties impacts electoral choices.


The anonymity of donations thwarted visibility into how money flows to parties, thereby diluting accountability and public trust in electoral democracy.


The scheme set up an “unequal playing field” favouring entities that could give without attribution, raising concerns under Article 14 about equality in political participation.


While curbing black money was a legitimate state aim, the means adopted (anonymous bonds) were disproportionate to that aim and lacked proper safeguards of transparency.


The Court emphasised that disclosure must be mandated where public interest demands it; democratic integrity outweighs donor privacy in the context of political party funding.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The scheme was declared unconstitutional and struck down. The Court directed the government to frame a new legislative scheme regulating political funding that ensures disclosure, transparency and accountability consistent with constitutional mandates.

🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Marks a major victory for political transparency and the right to information in electoral law.


Underlines that restrictions on disclosure of political donations must pass the proportionality test under Articles 14 & 19.


Affirms that democracy demands not only formal rights but meaningful access to information for citizens to exercise those rights.


Signals that the legislature must design political funding laws with checks against invisible influence and hidden money in politics.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Union of India v. Association for Democratic Reforms (2002) 5 SCC 294 – Held that political parties must disclose details of donations and expenditures, thereby establishing the right of voters to access such information.


Significance: Laid the foundation for transparency in electoral funding and informed the 2024 judgment’s approach to disclosure.


Khempal Singh v. State of Rajasthan (noted for the principle of proportionality in democratic context) – Affirmed that laws affecting political processes must be proportionate and justified.


Significance: Provided the analytical framework for assessing the scheme’s compatibility with Articles 14 & 19.

⚖️ CS-24-05 | Aligarh Muslim University through its Registrar (Faizan Mustafa) v. Naresh Agarwal & Ors. (2024)
Citation: (2024) INSC 856 | C.A. No. 2286 of 2006
 Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud, and Justices Sanjiv Khanna, Surya Kant, J.B. Pardiwala, Dipankar Datta, Manoj Misra, Satish Chandra Sharma
 Judgment Date: 8 November 2024
 Bench Strength: Seven-Judge Constitution Bench
 Majority: 4 : 3
 Key Provisions: Article 30(1) of the Constitution (Minority educational rights)
 Statute Involved: Aligarh Muslim University Act, 1920 and its Amendments (1951, 1965, 1981)

🧩 Factual Background
Origins: Sir Syed Ahmed Khan established the Mohammedan Anglo-Oriental College in 1877 to promote modern education among Indian Muslims. In 1920, the British Imperial Legislative Council enacted the Aligarh Muslim University Act, converting the college into a statutory university.


Post-Constitution: After 1950, Article 30(1) guaranteed minorities the right to “establish and administer” educational institutions.


In S. Azeez Basha v. Union of India (1968)*, the Supreme Court held that since AMU was “established by Parliament”, it was not a minority institution.


In 1981, Parliament amended the AMU Act, stating that the university was “an institution established by the Muslims of India”.


In 2005, the Allahabad High Court struck down AMU’s 50 % Muslim reservation in postgraduate medical courses, reaffirming Azeez Basha.


In 2019, a three-judge bench led by CJI Ranjan Gogoi referred the question of Azeez Basha’s correctness to a seven-judge Constitution Bench.



⚙️ Issues Before the Court
1️⃣ Whether Azeez Basha v. Union of India (1968) correctly held that AMU was not a minority educational institution.
 2️⃣ Whether an educational institution established by statute can qualify as a “minority institution” under Article 30(1).
 3️⃣ What are the criteria for determining when an institution qualifies as a minority educational institution.

🏛 Decision / Ratio Decidendi
By a 4:3 majority, the Supreme Court overruled Azeez Basha.


It held that an institution does not lose its minority character merely because it is incorporated or recognised by statute.


The right under Article 30(1) extends to institutions established both before and after 1950, if they were founded by and for a minority community.


“Establishment” refers to the founding initiative and community effort, while “incorporation” gives legal personality. The minority’s authorship and purpose remain decisive.


The Court clarified that AMU’s minority status would be determined separately by a regular bench based on factual evaluation under the new criteria.


Ratio: The test of minority status under Article 30(1) depends on who conceived, funded, and developed the institution, not on the formal mode of its legal incorporation.

💡 Reasons for the Decision
(a) Reference Validity
The majority upheld the Rahmaniya (1981) reference questioning Azeez Basha, holding that the Chief Justice, as master of the roster, has administrative discretion to assign a matter to a larger bench.


The dissent (Justices Kant, Datta, Sharma) argued that the two-judge bench in Rahmaniya lacked authority to doubt a five-judge precedent and to suggest a bench size.


(b) Establishment vs. Incorporation
The majority emphasised that “establishment” = founding initiative, “incorporation” = legal recognition.


If an institution had an independent existence before the statute, statutory incorporation cannot erase its minority character.


(c) Minority Rights and Article 30(1)
Minority rights under Article 30 are foundational, not derivative. They exist to protect cultural and educational identity, and cannot be limited by legislative formalities.


Article 30(1) also covers pre-Constitution institutions founded by minorities.


(d) Criteria for Determining Minority Educational Status
1️⃣ Who founded the institution: Was the initiative taken by a minority group?
 2️⃣ Purpose of establishment: Was the object to advance the minority’s educational/cultural interests?
 3️⃣ Source of funding and development: Did the minority community contribute to its creation (land, funds, infrastructure)?
 4️⃣ Control and administration: Is the governance structure consistent with minority aims (though full control is not mandatory)?
 5️⃣ Beneficiaries: The institution must primarily, though not exclusively, serve the minority community.
 6️⃣ Historical context: The status is judged as on the date the Constitution came into force.

🧭 Dissenting Views
Justice Surya Kant – The Rahmaniya reference was procedurally invalid; a Division Bench could not reopen a Constitution Bench ruling.


Justice Dipankar Datta – Azeez Basha was correctly decided; AMU’s creation by statute and state control meant it was not a minority institution.


Justice Satish C. Sharma – Minority status requires factual and legal control by the minority; statutory and financial control by the State negates it.



✅ Outcome
Azeez Basha (1968) was overruled.


The Court laid down binding criteria for determining minority educational status.


It remitted AMU’s specific minority claim to a regular bench for determination under the clarified framework.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Restores and expands the constitutional scope of Article 30(1) — protecting minority institutions irrespective of statutory incorporation.


Distinguishes founding intent from legislative recognition, ensuring minority rights survive statutory formalisation.


Balances minority autonomy with state oversight: regulation permissible, but essence of minority control must remain.


Strengthens the pluralist and secular character of Indian education policy by affirming cultural diversity through education.


Sets a new national benchmark for determining minority educational status across India.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
1️⃣ S. Azeez Basha v. Union of India (1968)
 Held: AMU was not a minority institution as it was created by statute.
 Overruled: 2024 judgment rejected this formalistic approach and restored substance over form.
2️⃣ Anjuman-e-Rahmaniya v. District Inspector of Schools (1981)
 Held: Questioned Azeez Basha’s correctness and referred the issue to a larger bench.
 Significance: Validated as a legitimate reference by the 2024 majority.
3️⃣ T.M.A. Pai Foundation v. State of Karnataka (2002)
 Held: Defined minority rights to establish and administer educational institutions.
 Significance: Provided interpretive framework for Article 30 autonomy.
4️⃣ P.A. Inamdar v. State of Maharashtra (2005)
 Held: Clarified limits on state regulation of minority and non-minority institutions.
 Significance: Balanced autonomy with regulatory fairness.
5️⃣ The Durgah Committee, Ajmer v. Syed Hussain Ali (1961)
 Held: Defined rights of religious denominations under Article 26.
 Significance: Cited (and distinguished) — the 2024 Court clarified that Article 26 and Article 30 confer distinct rights.

⚖️ CS-24-06 | Amutha v. A.R. Subramanian (2024)
Bench: Justices Vikram Nath & Prasanna B. Varale
 Date of Judgment: 19 December 2024
 Key Statutes / Provisions:
Hindu Marriage Act, 1955 – Sections 13(1)(ia) (cruelty) & 13(1)(ib) (desertion)


Code of Civil Procedure, 1908 – Section 100 (second appeal jurisdiction)


Constitution of India – Article 142 (complete justice)



🧩 Facts of the Case
The parties married in June 2002; both were software engineers. After childbirth in 2003, the wife returned to her parental home and subsequently refused to resume co-habitation. A protracted separation followed (over 15 years), during which the wife is alleged to have filed a false criminal complaint of dowry harassment against the husband and his family, but did not pursue it. The husband initiated divorce proceedings in 2010 on grounds of cruelty and desertion. The trial court and first appellate court denied the relief; the High Court reversed the decision granting divorce. The wife appealed to the Supreme Court.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the filing of false criminal complaints against a spouse amounts to mental cruelty under Section 13(1)(ia).


Whether prolonged separation—without reasonable cause or intention to reconcile—constitutes desertion under Section 13(1)(ib).


Whether the Court can recognise the ground of irretrievable breakdown of marriage (not explicitly in the Act) via its equitable jurisdiction under Article 142.


Whether the High Court exceeded its jurisdiction under Section 100 CPC by re-evaluating facts already adjudicated.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court upheld the High Court’s grant of divorce: the wife’s conduct (including the filing of a bogus criminal complaint and prolonged separation) was held to constitute mental cruelty; her extended non-cohabitation signified desertion; and the marriage had irretrievably broken down, making its continuation futile.
Ratio: A marriage may be dissolved when one spouse inflicts mental cruelty (including via false criminal litigation), or wilfully abandons the matrimonial home over a sustained period, and when reconciliation is impossible such that continuation serves no purpose.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court observed that the wife’s false complaint caused mental anguish, anxiety and loss of reputation, thereby amounting to mental cruelty.


It held that separation of over 15 years, without any realistic effort at reunion, supported the inference of desertion.


The Court acknowledged that, though irretrievable breakdown is not a statutory ground, under Article 142 it may apply where marriage is a “dead relationship” and continuing it would be against justice.


On the Section 100 CPC point: The Court found the High Court had identified substantial questions of law and was justified in reversing earlier findings.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The appeal by the wife was dismissed; the decree of divorce in favour of the husband was affirmed. The Court also awarded lump-sum alimony and maintenance (despite the wife’s financial independence) in view of long separation and the interests of the child.

🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reinforces that false criminal complaints against a spouse can amount to mental cruelty, justifying divorce.


Affirms that prolonged separation with no sincere reconciliation efforts can be treated as desertion and indicate irretrievable breakdown.


Signals willingness of the Court to invoke equitable jurisdiction (under Article 142) to dissolve marriages where statutory grounds are exhausted but reality demands closure.


Provides clarity on alimony even where maintenance was not claimed, emphasising equity and dignity post-marriage.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Samar Ghosh v. Jaya Ghosh (2007) – Established rich criteria for mental cruelty (sustained conduct, emotional torment, disregard of duty).


Significance: The Court relied on this case to evaluate the wife’s conduct in Amutha.


Naveen Kohli v. Neelu Kohli (2006) – Recognised that long, voluntary separation may lead to irretrievable breakdown and divorce under Article 142.


Significance: Amutha re-emphasised this principle in the context of matrimonial relief.


K. Srinivas Rao v. D. A. Deepa (2013) – Held that filing of false criminal cases can amount to mental cruelty.


Significance: Directly relevant to the finding of cruelty in Amutha.



⚖️ CS-24-07 | Anees v. The State Govt. of NCT (2024)
Bench: Chief Justice D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice J.B. Pardiwala, and Justice Manoj Misra
 Date of Judgment: 3 May 2024
 Citation: 2024 INSC 368
 Key Statutes / Provisions:
Indian Penal Code, 1860: Section 302 – Murder


Indian Evidence Act, 1872: Section 106 – Burden of proof regarding facts within special knowledge



🧩 Facts of the Case
The appellant, Anees, was accused of murdering his wife, Saira, inside their home in Delhi. Only Anees, Saira, and their minor daughter were present at the time of death. The prosecution relied mainly on circumstantial evidence, including the appellant’s presence at the scene, recovery of the weapon, and forensic reports linking the blood samples to the deceased. Anees denied involvement, claiming his wife died by suicide.
 The trial court convicted him under Section 302 IPC, sentencing him to life imprisonment. The conviction was upheld by the High Court. Anees appealed to the Supreme Court, questioning the reliance on circumstantial evidence and the application of Section 106 of the Evidence Act.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
1️⃣ Whether the conviction for murder based solely on circumstantial evidence was sustainable.
 2️⃣ Whether the prosecution could rely on Section 106 of the Evidence Act to shift the burden of proof to the accused.
 3️⃣ Whether the courts below had ensured fair trial standards, particularly in handling hostile witnesses.

🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court dismissed the appeal and upheld the conviction under Section 302 IPC.
Ratio: Section 106 of the Evidence Act applies when the facts are within the exclusive knowledge of the accused and the prosecution has already established a complete chain of circumstances pointing to guilt. It cannot be used to fill gaps in the prosecution’s case.
The Court held that, given the offence occurred inside the matrimonial home and the accused offered no plausible explanation, the burden of proof under Section 106 legitimately shifted to him.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court reaffirmed that the burden of proof always begins with the prosecution; Section 106 comes into play only after the prosecution has made a prima facie case.


The facts — the death occurring inside the home, inconsistent statements by the accused, and the absence of any alternate explanation — supported guilt.


The forensic evidence corroborated the prosecution’s theory, and the accused’s silence strengthened the inference of guilt.


The Court clarified that misuse of Section 106 (to substitute for weak investigation) is impermissible, but when the accused is in exclusive possession of the facts, his silence can legitimately strengthen the prosecution’s case.


The Court reiterated that trial judges must remain alert when witnesses turn hostile, especially minors, ensuring that truth is not suppressed.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The appeal was dismissed.


The conviction of Anees under Section 302 IPC and sentence of life imprisonment were upheld.


The Supreme Court underscored that the proper application of Section 106 strengthens, rather than replaces, the prosecution’s burden of proof.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Clarifies the limited but critical use of Section 106 Evidence Act — to explain facts within the accused’s knowledge once a complete chain of circumstances is proved.


Reiterates that circumstantial evidence can validly sustain conviction if it excludes every hypothesis other than guilt.


Strengthens judicial vigilance in trials involving hostile witnesses and intra-house crimes (“closed-room” cases).


Reaffirms that silence or evasive explanations from an accused in possession of exclusive facts can lead to adverse inference under Section 106.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
1️⃣ Shambhu Nath Mehra v. State of Ajmer (1956)
 Held: Section 106 applies only to facts within the special knowledge of the accused; it does not relieve the prosecution of its primary burden.
 Significance: Foundation for correct use of Section 106, reaffirmed in Anees.
2️⃣ Trimukh Maroti Kirkan v. State of Maharashtra (2006)
 Held: Where the offence occurs in the dwelling shared by the accused and the deceased, and the accused offers no explanation, Section 106 permits inference of guilt.
 Significance: Applied directly to Anees’s situation.
3️⃣ Balvir Singh v. State of Uttarakhand (2022)
 Held: Circumstantial evidence must form a complete and consistent chain to convict; gaps cannot be filled by Section 106 alone.
 Significance: Quoted in Anees for cautionary limits of burden-shifting.


⚖️ CS-24-08 | Anjum Kadari v. Union of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 831 | SLP(C) No. 8541/2024
 Judgment Date: 5 November 2024
 Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice J.B. Pardiwala and Justice Manoj Misra
 Key Constitutional Articles: 14, 21, 21A, 25–30, 28
 Statutes Involved: U.P. Board of Madarsa Education Act, 2004 and University Grants Commission Act, 1956

🧩 Facts of the Case
The Uttar Pradesh Board of Madarsa Education Act, 2004 (“Madarsa Act”) created a Board to regulate standards of education for roughly 13,000 madarsas educating over 12 lakh students in the State.


The Act oversaw both religious and secular curricula and provided for recognition of qualifications such as Fazil (bachelor’s) and Kamil (post-graduate) degrees.


On 22 March 2024, the Allahabad High Court struck down the entire Act as unconstitutional for allegedly violating Articles 14, 21, 21A, the principle of secularism, and Section 22 of the UGC Act. It also directed the State to shift all madrasa students to schools under the State Education Boards.


Several Special Leave Petitions were filed, leading the Supreme Court to stay the judgment on 5 April 2024 and hear the matter on merits.



⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the Madarsa Act of 2004 is unconstitutional for violating secularism or Articles 14, 21 and 21A of the Constitution.


Whether the State of Uttar Pradesh had legislative competence to enact the Madarsa Act under Entry 25 of List III (Concurrent List).


Whether provisions of the Madarsa Act conflicted with the UGC Act (Entry 66 List I) and were thus beyond State competence.


Whether the High Court was justified in striking down the entire Act rather than applying severability to remove only the invalid parts.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court upheld the constitutional validity of the Madarsa Act except for those provisions relating to the award of higher-education degrees (Fazil and Kamil), which were found to conflict with the UGC Act.


The Court held that the Act is a regulatory statute, enacted under Entry 25 of List III, well within the State’s legislative competence.


The High Court’s wholesale invalidation was set aside; the unconstitutional provisions were severed.


Ratio: A law cannot be struck down for violating abstract constitutional principles such as secularism or democracy; it must contravene a specific constitutional provision or exceed legislative competence. The Madarsa Act validly regulates minority educational institutions so long as it does not encroach upon higher-education standards under the UGC Act.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
1. On Secularism and Constitutional Validity
The Court ruled that no statute can be invalidated merely for violating a “basic-structure” concept like secularism.


Striking down requires violation of a specific constitutional provision or absence of legislative competence.


Secularism, democracy, and federalism are guiding principles, not independent grounds of unconstitutionality.


2. Religious Instruction vs Religious Education
The Court distinguished religious instruction (teaching specific religious practices) from religious education (teaching philosophy of religion).


Article 28 prohibits only religious instruction in State-funded institutions, not religious education or recognition of private institutions offering both religious and secular content.


Therefore, recognising and regulating madarsas does not violate Article 28.


3. Madarsa Act as a Regulatory Statute
The Act aims to raise educational standards, not to promote religion.


Regulation of minority institutions is consistent with Articles 30 and 21A so long as the goal is quality education.


The Right to Education Act (2009) does not apply to minority institutions; hence, Article 21A is not infringed.


4. Legislative Competence
The State has authority under Entry 25 List III (Education) to legislate, even if the institutions offer some religious content.


Excluding education with a religious element from State competence would contradict Article 30, which expressly allows minorities to establish and administer educational institutions.


5. Conflict with UGC Act and Severability
The UGC Act occupies the field of higher-education standards (Entry 66 List I).


Provisions of the Madarsa Act conferring authority to grant Fazil and Kamil degrees were ultra vires, as they intruded upon Parliament’s domain.


These provisions were severable, allowing the remainder of the Act to remain valid.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court set aside the Allahabad High Court’s judgment.


The Madarsa Act was declared constitutionally valid except for its higher-education provisions (Fazil and Kamil degrees).


The State of Uttar Pradesh retains full power to regulate madarsa education up to the secondary level.


Directions were issued for the State to coordinate with the UGC to regularise higher-education equivalence.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reaffirms that laws cannot be invalidated on abstract basic-structure principles; specific constitutional violation is required.


Clarifies that religious education is not barred under Article 28; regulation of minority institutions is compatible with secularism.


Defines the boundary between State (Entry 25 List III) and Union (Entry 66 List I) competence in education.


Upholds substantive equality by ensuring minority institutions achieve national educational standards.


Demonstrates proper application of doctrine of severability — only unconstitutional provisions struck down, not the entire Act.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
T.M.A. Pai Foundation v. State of Karnataka (2002) – Defined scope of minority educational rights under Article 30.
 Significance: Provided guiding principles for autonomy with regulation.


P.A. Inamdar v. State of Maharashtra (2005) – Clarified permissible regulation of unaided minority institutions.
 Significance: Applied to justify State’s quality-control role.


The Durgah Committee, Ajmer v. Syed Hussain Ali (1961) – Distinguished denominational rights under Article 26 from educational-minority rights under Article 30.
 Significance: Used to demarcate religious administration from educational autonomy.



⚖️ CS-24-09 | Association for Democratic Reforms v. Election Commission of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 341 | Writ Petition (Civil) No. 434 of 2023
 Date of Judgment: 26 April 2024
 Bench: Justice Sanjiv Khanna and Justice Dipankar Datta
 Key Statutes / Articles: Articles 14, 19(1)(a), 324 and 326 of the Constitution; Representation of the People Act 1951; Conduct of Elections Rules 1961

🧩 Facts of the Case
The Association for Democratic Reforms (ADR), an NGO, petitioned the Supreme Court questioning the reliability, transparency, and security of Electronic Voting Machines (EVMs) used by the Election Commission of India (ECI).
 They sought either:
a complete return to paper ballots, or


100 percent counting of Voter Verifiable Paper Audit Trail (VVPAT) slips alongside electronic tallies.


Currently, only five randomly selected polling stations per constituency undergo VVPAT verification. The petitioners argued that this limited sample was insufficient to ensure accuracy, and urged that either voters should physically handle their slips or that every vote should be verified through paper.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the use of EVMs ensures the integrity and security of elections under Articles 324 and 326.


Whether 100 % VVPAT verification is constitutionally or statutorily mandated to guarantee free and fair elections.


Whether returning to paper ballots is feasible, given India’s electoral scale.


What procedural safeguards must be in place to ensure public trust in the EVM-VVPAT system.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court dismissed the petition, upholding the current EVM-VVPAT system. It held that:
The existing mechanism, in which a VVPAT slip is visible to the voter for seven seconds before being sealed, satisfies the constitutional requirement of free and fair elections.
However, the Court issued two new directions to enhance transparency:
Symbol loading units used for configuring VVPATs must be sealed and stored with EVMs for 45 days after elections, with signatures of candidates or representatives.


Candidates finishing second or third may request technical verification of up to five percent of EVMs in their constituency within seven days of result declaration. If tampering is found, the ECI will refund verification costs.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
1. How an EVM Works and Why Manipulation Is Unlikely
An EVM comprises a ballot unit, control unit, and VVPAT.


Candidate names and symbols are physically affixed; the system stores no political data before symbol-loading.


EVMs are not connected to the internet and have neutral firmware that cannot be altered post-manufacture.


Multiple pre-poll safeguards exist: mock polling, sealing, serial-number verification, and multi-party observation.


After voting, EVMs are sealed, guarded, and observed by party agents; results are retrieved only on counting day.
 → Hence, systemic hacking or tampering is impractical and unproven.


2. Rejection of 100 % VVPAT Counting
The Court held that while voters have a right to ensure their vote is recorded and counted, this does not mean every vote must be manually verified.


Expanding verification to all slips would delay results, double manpower, and heighten human error.


No empirical evidence suggested mismatches in the five-station sampling method.


3. No Return to Paper Ballots
Paper-ballot systems are vulnerable to booth capturing, invalid votes, and administrative manipulation, unmanageable with 97 crore voters.


EVMs enhance efficiency, eliminate invalid ballots, and strengthen auditability.


4. Directions for Greater Transparency
The Court encouraged procedural upgrades rather than regression to older methods.


Justices Khanna and Datta emphasised continuous innovation and data-based audit mechanisms to maintain voter confidence.



✅ Decision / Outcome
Petition dismissed.


Current EVM-VVPAT framework upheld.


Two additional safeguards ordered (symbol-loading storage + optional verification).



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reinforces the principle that constitutional guarantees of free and fair elections demand reasonable reliability, not perfect infallibility.


Defines judicial limits: courts cannot micromanage election technology absent proven systemic failure.


Recognises the ECI’s technical and administrative autonomy under Article 324.


Introduces procedural innovations—verifiable audit trails and candidate-initiated verification—to build public confidence.


Balances transparency and administrative feasibility in modern electoral governance.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Significance
Subramanian Swamy v. Election Commission of India (2013) – Directed ECI to incorporate VVPATs to strengthen transparency; foundation for present regime.


N. Chandrababu Naidu v. Union of India (2019) – Upheld random sample verification in five EVMs per constituency; adopted as standard procedure.


People’s Union for Civil Liberties v. Union of India (2003) – Recognised voter’s right to know as part of Article 19(1)(a); applied analogously to reinforce transparency as democratic necessity.


Kuldip Nayar v. Union of India (2006) – Reaffirmed judicial deference to ECI in electoral procedures.

⚖️ CS-24-10 | Babu Sahebagouda Rudragoudar & Ors. v. State of Karnataka (2024)
Citation: 2024 LiveLaw (SC) 316
 Date of Judgment: 19 April 2024
 Bench: Justices B.R. Gavai and Sandeep Mehta
 Key Statutory Provisions:
Section 302 r/w Sections 34 and 149, Indian Penal Code (1860)


Section 27, Indian Evidence Act (1872)


Section 378, Criminal Procedure Code (1973)



🧩 Facts of the Case
The complainant’s son (the deceased) had gone to construct a bund in their agricultural field with other villagers. On their return to the village, the accused persons appeared and threatened to take revenge for the earlier murder of one Sangound, in which members of the complainant’s family were accused. The accused then attacked and killed the complainant’s son.
 A First Information Report was lodged, and a case was registered against six accused for offences under Sections 143, 147, 148, 302 read with 149 IPC.
The Trial Court found that the prosecution had failed to establish guilt beyond reasonable doubt and acquitted all six accused. The State of Karnataka appealed. The High Court reversed the acquittal for three accused (A-1 to A-3) and convicted them under Section 302 r/w 34 IPC, sentencing them to life imprisonment.
 Aggrieved, the accused approached the Supreme Court challenging the High Court’s reversal of their acquittal.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the High Court was justified in reversing the acquittal recorded by the Trial Court.


What are the principles governing interference with acquittals by appellate courts under Section 378 CrPC.


Whether the High Court correctly appreciated the evidence and the admissibility of disclosure statements under Section 27 of the Evidence Act.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court set aside the conviction and restored the Trial Court’s acquittal.
Ratio: An appellate court can reverse an acquittal only if the judgment is patently perverse, based on misreading or omission of material evidence, or if no two reasonable views are possible and only the view of guilt can be drawn from the record.
The Court held that the High Court’s interference was unwarranted because the Trial Court’s view was reasonable and based on a correct appreciation of evidence.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
1. Appellate Restraint in Acquittal Appeals
The Supreme Court reiterated that in State appeals, interference with an acquittal is permissible only where the lower court’s finding is manifestly unreasonable or suffers from perversity.


The accused enjoys a double presumption of innocence—first as an accused and again after acquittal.


The High Court erred by re-evaluating the entire evidence and substituting its own conclusions for those of the Trial Court without establishing perversity.


2. Evaluation of Evidence and Motive
The Court observed that the alleged motive of “revenge for Sangound’s death” was double-edged: it could equally have motivated the complainant party to falsely implicate the accused.


This cast serious doubt on the prosecution version.


3. Admissibility of Disclosure Statements (Section 27 Evidence Act)
The Court referred to State of U.P. v. Deoman Upadhyaya (1960) and Ramanand @ Nandlal Bharti v. State of U.P. (2022), clarifying that only that portion of an accused’s statement which distinctly leads to discovery is admissible; the rest is inadmissible.


Mere production of the memorandum prepared by the Investigating Officer without the officer narrating the circumstances of its recording is not proof of its contents.


4. Assessment of Witness Credibility
Inconsistencies and contradictions in witness accounts further weakened the prosecution case.


Hence, the Trial Court’s view acquitting the accused was fully sustainable.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The appeal by the accused was allowed.


The High Court’s judgment was set aside, and the Trial Court’s acquittal was restored.


The accused were released; their bail bonds were discharged.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Reaffirms the limited scope of appellate interference with acquittals — interference is justified only when the Trial Court’s view is perverse or wholly unsustainable.


Highlights the double presumption of innocence principle protecting accused persons after acquittal.


Clarifies the proper evidentiary use of Section 27 Evidence Act—mere formal proof is insufficient without contextual testimony.


Demonstrates judicial caution where motive may operate both ways, making the prosecution case doubtful.


Strengthens jurisprudence on maintaining balance between State’s right to appeal and the sanctity of acquittal judgments.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
State of U.P. v. Deoman Upadhyaya (1960) – Only that portion of an accused’s disclosure leading directly to discovery is admissible.


Ramanand @ Nandlal Bharti v. State of U.P. (2022) – Exhibiting a memorandum alone does not prove its content; Investigating Officer must testify to the facts.


Chandrappa v. State of Karnataka (2007) – Established guiding principles for appellate interference in acquittal appeals.

⚖️ CS-24-11 | Bar of Indian Lawyers through its President Jasbir Singh Malik v. D.K. Gandhi (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC ___ | 2024 LiveLaw (SC) ___
 Date of Judgment: 14 May 2024
 Bench: Justice Bela M. Trivedi and Justice Pankaj Mithal
 Key Statutes:
Consumer Protection Act, 1986 / 2019 – Section 2(1)(o): “Service”


Advocates Act, 1961 – Professional conduct and disciplinary control of advocates



🧩 Background
This case is a landmark pronouncement on whether legal services provided by advocates fall within the ambit of the Consumer Protection Act (CPA). It settles a long-standing conflict between the consumer law regime and the professional-regulatory framework under the Advocates Act, 1961.

⚙️ Facts of the Case
The dispute arose when D.K. Gandhi engaged an advocate to file a complaint under Section 138, Negotiable Instruments Act, 1881, concerning a dishonoured cheque of ₹20,000.


The case was later settled, but Gandhi alleged that the advocate failed to deliver the settlement amount and instead filed a separate suit seeking ₹5,000 as his legal fees.


Gandhi filed a consumer complaint before the District Consumer Forum alleging deficiency in service by the advocate.


The District Forum and later the National Commission held that advocates’ services fall within the definition of “service” under Section 2(1)(o) of the CPA.


The Bar of Indian Lawyers, through its President, challenged this before the Supreme Court, arguing that legal services cannot be treated as consumer services.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether legal services rendered by advocates fall within the definition of “service” under Section 2(1)(o) of the Consumer Protection Act.


Whether advocates can be held liable for deficiency in service before consumer fora.


Whether applying consumer law to advocates conflicts with the regulatory scheme of the Advocates Act, 1961.



💼 Arguments
Petitioner (Bar of Indian Lawyers):
The Advocates Act, 1961 provides a comprehensive framework for regulating professional conduct and disciplining advocates; hence, advocates cannot simultaneously be regulated under consumer law.


The relationship between advocate and client is a contract of personal service, not a contract for service — and the latter alone falls within the CPA.


The legal profession is sui generis and cannot be equated with commercial services; outcomes in litigation depend on external judicial and factual contingencies.


Subjecting advocates to CPA jurisdiction would impair professional independence and open floodgates of frivolous complaints from dissatisfied clients.


Respondent (D.K. Gandhi):
Advocates provide paid services, establishing a service provider–consumer relationship; hence, clients must have access to consumer-law remedies.


Excluding advocates would deny clients effective redressal for negligence or misconduct.


Accountability through consumer fora would enhance professional standards, similar to doctors held liable under Indian Medical Association v. V.P. Shantha (1995).


Applying CPA to advocates would not conflict with the Advocates Act but rather complement it by increasing transparency.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court allowed the appeal and set aside the decision of the National Consumer Disputes Redressal Commission (NCDRC).
Held:
 Services rendered by advocates do not fall within the definition of “service” under Section 2(1)(o) of the Consumer Protection Act.
Ratio:
The relationship between an advocate and client is one of trust, confidence, and personal obligation, not a commercial or business arrangement.


Such services constitute a “contract of personal service”, which is expressly excluded from the CPA.


The Advocates Act, 1961 already provides adequate mechanisms to deal with misconduct and negligence through the Bar Council’s disciplinary jurisdiction.


Legal practice is not a trade, business, or profession for commercial gain, but a noble profession governed by ethics and duty to the court and client.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court observed that legal representation often involves factors beyond the advocate’s control — the judge’s discretion, quality of evidence, and procedural complexities.


Hence, equating legal services with market-based services (like banking or insurance) is legally and conceptually flawed.


It reaffirmed that the Consumer Protection Act excludes contracts of personal service, which involve fiduciary relationships rather than purely commercial transactions.


The Court emphasized that the legal profession is sui generis — unique and rooted in public duty — and cannot be treated as an economic service under consumer law.



✅ Decision / Outcome
Advocates’ services are excluded from the Consumer Protection Act.


Consumer complaints alleging deficiency in legal services are not maintainable.


The proper remedy for clients alleging professional misconduct or negligence lies under Sections 35–44 of the Advocates Act, 1961, before the Bar Council.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Establishes a clear demarcation between professional regulation and consumer-law liability.


Upholds the independence and integrity of the legal profession, insulating it from consumer-forum jurisdiction.


Clarifies that legal services are governed by the fiduciary and ethical framework of the Advocates Act, not the commercial framework of the CPA.


Aligns Indian law with the global principle that lawyers owe duties to both clients and courts, not merely contractual obligations.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Indian Medical Association v. V.P. Shantha (1995) – Distinguished; doctors provide “service” under CPA, but advocates do not, due to the nature of their fiduciary duties.


D.K. Gandhi v. M. Mathias (2007) – Earlier NCDRC precedent including advocates under CPA; overruled.


Vishaka v. State of Rajasthan (1997) – Reiterated the importance of professional ethics and regulatory oversight in professions.

⚖️ CS-24-12 | Bilkis Yakub Rasool v. Union of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 24
 Date of Judgment: 8 January 2024
 Bench: Justice B.V. Nagarathna and Justice Ujjal Bhuyan
 Relevant Statutes / Provisions:
Article 32, Constitution of India — Enforcement of Fundamental Rights


Article 14, Constitution of India — Right to Equality


Article 21, Constitution of India — Right to Life and Personal Liberty


Sections 432, 433, 433A, and 432(7), Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 — Remission and commutation of sentences



🧩 Factual Background
The petitioner, Bilkis Yakub Rasool, a survivor of gang rape and communal violence during the 2002 Gujarat riots, challenged the remission orders passed by the State of Gujarat that prematurely released eleven convicts who had been sentenced to life imprisonment for her rape and the murder of her family members.
The case had originally been investigated by the CBI and tried in Mumbai, where the trial court in 2008 convicted the accused and sentenced them to life imprisonment. The Bombay High Court and later the Supreme Court upheld the convictions.
After serving about fourteen years in prison, the convicts applied to the Gujarat Government for remission under its 1992 policy. Relying on an earlier order of the Supreme Court in Radheshyam Bhagwandas Shah v. State of Gujarat (2022), Gujarat granted remission on 10 August 2022. These orders were challenged before the Supreme Court by the petitioner and by public-spirited individuals.

⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether a writ petition by the victim challenging remission was maintainable under Article 32.


Whether public interest litigations (PILs) challenging remission were maintainable.


Whether the State of Gujarat was competent to pass remission orders.


Whether the remission orders were legal and valid under the CrPC.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court allowed the petitions and quashed the remission orders as illegal and void.
Held:
 (1) The writ petition filed by the victim was maintainable under Article 32, as it sought enforcement of fundamental rights under Articles 14 and 21.
 (2) The State of Gujarat lacked jurisdiction under Section 432(7) CrPC because the convicts had been tried and sentenced in Maharashtra; thus, the State of Maharashtra alone was the appropriate government.
 (3) The remission orders of 10 August 2022 were unlawful, having been obtained by fraud upon the Court in the Radheshyam Shah case.
 (4) The convicts were directed to surrender within two weeks to serve the remainder of their life sentences.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
1️⃣ Maintainability of the Writ Petition (Article 32):
The Court rejected the argument that the petitioner should have approached the Gujarat High Court.


Since she sought enforcement of fundamental rights (Articles 14 and 21), she could directly invoke Article 32 before the Supreme Court.


The High Court could not overrule or vary the earlier Supreme Court order in Radheshyam Shah; hence, direct recourse was justified.


2️⃣ Jurisdiction – “Appropriate Government” (Section 432(7) CrPC):
The appropriate government for remission is the one under whose jurisdiction the sentencing court functions, not where the offence was committed or the prisoner is lodged.


Because the convicts were sentenced in Mumbai, the Government of Maharashtra alone had jurisdiction to consider remission.


The Gujarat Government usurped powers not vested in it; hence, its orders were ultra vires the CrPC.


3️⃣ Fraud on the Court – Radheshyam Shah Order:
The convict who obtained the Radheshyam Shah order had suppressed material facts, including that:


His remission plea was already under consideration in Maharashtra, and


The Gujarat 1992 policy had been withdrawn.


The Court held that the Radheshyam Shah direction was procured by fraud and therefore non-est in law.


4️⃣ Rule of Law and Victim’s Rights:
The Court observed that the remission of convicts in heinous crimes eroded public confidence in the justice system.


Liberty cannot be claimed in violation of the rule of law; only lawful liberty is constitutionally protected.


5️⃣ Guiding Principles for Remission:
The Court enumerated non-exhaustive conditions under the CrPC:
Application must be filed before the State of conviction, not of offence.


Compliance with Section 433A CrPC—a life convict must serve at least 14 years before remission.


Opinion of the trial judge is mandatory under Section 432(2).


The policy applicable should be that of the competent State, generally the one in force at the time of conviction.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The remission orders dated 10 August 2022 passed by the Gujarat Government were quashed.


The convicts were ordered to surrender within two weeks.


The Court declared that remission obtained through fraud and want of jurisdiction is null and void ab initio.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Clarifies jurisdiction: The “appropriate government” under Section 432(7) CrPC is the State where the sentence is imposed, not where the crime occurred.


Affirms victim’s standing: Victims can approach the Supreme Court under Article 32 to challenge executive actions infringing their fundamental rights.


Reinforces rule of law: Fraudulent or ultra vires executive acts cannot confer valid liberty.


Sets procedural safeguards: Reinforces that remission is a discretionary privilege, not a legal entitlement.


Promotes accountability: Prevents misuse of remission power in politically or socially sensitive cases.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Radheshyam Bhagwandas Shah v. State of Gujarat (2022): Directed Gujarat to consider remission — later declared invalid as obtained by fraud.


State of Haryana v. Jagdish (2010): Clarified application of remission policies under Sections 432 and 433A CrPC.


Maru Ram v. Union of India (1981): Laid foundational principles governing remission and commutation under the CrPC.



⚖️ CS-24-13 | Central Organisation for Railway Electrification v. M/S ECI-SPIC-SMO-MCML (JV) & JSW Steel Ltd. v. South Western Railway (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 857 (8 November 2024)
 Bench: Chief Justice D.Y. Chandrachud, Justices Hrishikesh Roy, P.S. Narasimha, J.B. Pardiwala, and Manoj Misra
 Type: Constitution Bench (Five Judges)
 Relevant Statutes / Provisions:
Section 12(5), Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996: Disqualifies arbitrators who have specified relationships with the parties.


Seventh Schedule, Arbitration Act: Lists categories of relationships leading to ineligibility (e.g., current employment, financial interest, advisory roles).


Section 18, Arbitration Act: Mandates equal treatment of parties in arbitration proceedings.


Article 14, Constitution of India: Equality before law and fairness in State action.


GCC Clauses 64(3)(a) & 64(3)(b): Railway contract clauses allowing appointment of arbitrators — either serving or retired officers, depending on waiver of Section 12(5).



🧩 Background / Facts of the Case
The Central Organisation for Railway Electrification (CORE) entered into contracts with a joint venture (M/S ECI-SPIC-SMO-MCML) for railway electrification. The contract contained a standard General Conditions of Contract (GCC) clause for arbitration, giving CORE authority to nominate arbitrators from its curated panel of serving or retired railway officers.
When disputes arose and CORE terminated the contract, the JV objected to this procedure, asserting that the panel system was unilateral and biased, violating Section 12(5) of the Arbitration Act. The JV instead sought appointment of a neutral sole arbitrator through the Allahabad High Court.
The High Court appointed a retired judge as sole arbitrator. CORE appealed, arguing that the GCC arbitration clause was contractually binding.
The matter was referred to a five-judge Constitution Bench to resolve the conflict among earlier precedents — TRF Ltd. (2017), Perkins Eastman (2019), CORE (2019), and Tantia Constructions (2021) — on whether an ineligible or interested party can nominate arbitrators from its own panel.

⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether a person disqualified under Section 12(5) read with the Seventh Schedule can authorize or mandate appointment of arbitrators from a panel curated by them.


Whether requiring a private party to choose from a State-curated panel of arbitrators violates Section 18 (equality of parties).


Whether unilateral appointment of arbitrators by a government entity violates Article 14 of the Constitution.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
By a 3:2 majority, the Supreme Court held that unilateral appointment of arbitrators by one party, especially a State entity, is impermissible as it violates the principles of equality, impartiality, and independence central to arbitration.
Held:
Clauses allowing one party to appoint or control appointment of arbitrators violate Section 12(5) read with the Seventh Schedule.


PSU or government entities may maintain panels, but requiring the counterparty to choose only from that panel violates Section 18 (equal treatment of parties).


The principle of party autonomy is subject to mandatory statutory safeguards ensuring neutrality and fairness.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
1️⃣ Independence and Impartiality Are Mandatory
The majority (CJI Chandrachud, Pardiwala & Misra JJ.) held that the Arbitration Act’s structure prioritizes neutrality over party autonomy.


Sections 12 and 18 read with Article 14 impose a duty of equal treatment at all stages — including appointment.


Requiring a private party to select from a PSU’s own panel creates an “inequality of arms”, undermining the fairness of the process.


2️⃣ Limitation on Party Autonomy
While party autonomy is foundational, it operates within the limits of statutory fairness.


Any arbitration agreement that undermines impartiality is contrary to the public policy of India and void under Section 34(2)(b)(ii).


3️⃣ Public Contracts and Article 14
In contracts involving State entities, constitutional obligations of fairness and non-arbitrariness apply.


The unilateral appointment of a sole arbitrator by a State party is contrary to Article 14 and public policy.


4️⃣ Minority Opinions (Roy & Narasimha JJ.)
Justice Hrishikesh Roy: Unilateral appointments should not be blanketly prohibited; courts should assess bias under the challenge mechanism (Sections 12–15).


Justice Narasimha: Section 18 (equality of parties) applies after the tribunal is constituted; impartiality can be ensured through existing statutory safeguards.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The High Court’s appointment of a sole arbitrator was set aside.


The Court directed that arbitrators be appointed as per GCC procedure, but excluding serving officers or any person falling under the Seventh Schedule disqualifications.


The 2019 CORE precedent allowing PSU-controlled panel arbitration was overruled.


The majority clarified that public-sector arbitral panels are permissible only if both parties participate equally in the selection process.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Unilateral appointment = impermissible: Reinforces that even contractual consent cannot override statutory impartiality safeguards.


Equal treatment doctrine expanded: Section 18 applies to every stage of arbitration — from appointment to award.


Public policy & Article 14: State entities must ensure fairness in contractual arbitration clauses.


Overrules conflicting precedents: TRF Ltd., Perkins Eastman, and Tantia Constructions now harmonized under this Constitution Bench ruling.


Arbitration reform milestone: Ensures India’s arbitration law aligns with global standards of independence and equality.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
TRF Ltd. v. Energo Engineering Projects Ltd. (2017): Held that an ineligible person cannot nominate another arbitrator.


Perkins Eastman Architects DPC v. HSCC (India) Ltd. (2019): Extended TRF — a party interested in the dispute cannot appoint an arbitrator.


Union of India v. Tantia Constructions (2021): Criticized unilateral PSU appointments; led to the Constitution Bench reference.


JSW Steel Ltd. v. South Western Railway (2024): Heard with the present case; affirmed equality and impartiality principles in PSU arbitrations.


Article 14 Jurisprudence: ONGC v. Afcons Gunanusa JV (2022) reaffirmed the requirement of procedural fairness in State contracts.

⚖️ CS-24-14 | Child in Conflict with Law v. The State of Karnataka (2024)
Citation: 2024 SCC OnLine SC 798
 Date of Judgment: 22 April 2024
 Bench: Justices Rajesh Bindal and C.T. Ravikumar
 Relevant Statutes / Provisions:
Section 14(3), JJ Act 2015 – Time limit for completing preliminary assessment in heinous offences.


Section 15(1), JJ Act 2015 – Assessment of mental and physical capacity of the child and ability to understand consequences.


Section 19, JJ Act 2015 – Transfer of cases by the Juvenile Justice Board to the Children’s Court.


Sections 376(i), 342 IPC and Sections 4–8, POCSO Act 2012 – Alleged offences against the child.



🧩 Factual Background
A Child in Conflict with Law (“CCL”) was accused of rape and related offences under the IPC and the POCSO Act.
 After the child was granted bail, the Juvenile Justice Board (JJB) undertook a preliminary assessment under Section 15 to determine whether he should be tried as a juvenile or transferred for trial as an adult before a Children’s Court.
Initially, the Principal Magistrate recommended adult trial; however, a subsequent full-Board order found that the CCL should be treated as a juvenile.
 The victim’s mother challenged that decision before the High Court under Section 19, arguing that the Board had exceeded the three-month time limit prescribed in Section 14(3).
The Karnataka High Court agreed, directing that the child be tried as an adult.
 The CCL, through his mother, appealed to the Supreme Court, questioning the rigidity of the time-limit and the correctness of the High Court’s direction.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the three-month period in Section 14(3) of the JJ Act for completing preliminary assessment is mandatory or directory.


Whether failure to complete the assessment within that period vitiates the proceedings against a child accused of heinous offences.


What is the proper balance between procedural timelines and the rehabilitative object of the JJ Act.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court held that the three-month period under Section 14(3) is directory, not mandatory.
 Non-completion of the assessment within that period does not invalidate proceedings or render the Board’s decision void.
Ratio: The purpose of Section 14(3) is to ensure expedition, not to impose an absolute bar. The statute provides no express consequence for non-compliance, unlike other provisions (e.g., Section 14(4) for petty offences). Therefore, timelines must be applied flexibly to uphold substantive justice.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
Legislative Intent and Context:


The JJ Act is a beneficial, child-centric legislation. Its focus is rehabilitation, not punishment.


Rigid procedural interpretation would defeat the Act’s reformative intent.


Nature of Section 14(3):


The provision sets a procedural direction, not a jurisdictional bar.


Absence of penal consequence indicates legislative intent to treat it as directory.


Systemic Practicality:


The preliminary assessment involves coordination between the JJB, investigating officers, and psychological experts.


Delays often occur due to factors beyond the control of the Board or the child.


Balancing Speed and Fairness:


The Court emphasised procedural efficiency with fairness.


Substantive assessment of the child’s maturity, capacity, and understanding must prevail over mechanical adherence to timelines.


Reaffirmation of the Board’s Authority:


The Board retains full jurisdiction to assess the case even after the lapse of three months, provided the inquiry is fair, reasoned, and based on expert inputs.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court set aside the High Court’s order, restoring the JJB’s decision to treat the CCL as a juvenile.


It held that delay beyond three months does not nullify proceedings.


The Board was directed to continue the inquiry in accordance with Sections 14–19 of the JJ Act.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Procedural timelines in the JJ Act are directory, promoting substantive justice over technicality.


Reinforces the rehabilitative philosophy of juvenile justice — prioritising assessment of culpability and maturity.


Clarifies that failure to meet procedural deadlines does not erase jurisdiction of the Board.


Ensures victims’ and children’s rights are balanced within a fair and non-punitive process.


Strengthens child-friendly justice, consistent with India’s obligations under the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Pratap Singh v. State of Jharkhand (2005) – Clarified the concept of “juvenile” and application of beneficial interpretation.


Barun Chandra Thakur v. Master Bholu (2022) – Discussed standards for preliminary assessment under Section 15 JJ Act.


Shilpa Mittal v. State of NCT Delhi (2020) – Differentiated “heinous” and “serious” offences for children’s trials.


Ravi v. State of Maharashtra (2019) – Stressed procedural fairness in juvenile proceedings.


State of Punjab v. Gurmit Singh (1996) – Reiterated the need for sensitivity in trials involving sexual offences.



⚖️ CS-24-15 | Cox and Kings Ltd. v. SAP India Pvt. Ltd. (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 708 (also reported as 2023 INSC 1051, Constitution Bench)
 Bench: Chief Justice D.Y. Chandrachud, Justices Hrishikesh Roy, P.S. Narasimha, J.B. Pardiwala and Manoj Misra
 Date of Judgment: 26 March 2024
 Type: Constitution Bench (Five Judges)
Relevant Provisions:
Section 7, Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996 — Definition of arbitration agreement.


Section 11, Arbitration and Conciliation Act, 1996 — Appointment of arbitrators.


Group of Companies Doctrine (GoCD) — Principle allowing non-signatories within a corporate group to be included in arbitration proceedings under specific conditions.



🧩 Background and Facts
In 2010, Cox & Kings Ltd. (C&K) entered into a software licensing agreement with SAP India Pvt. Ltd. for installation of SAP’s “Hybris Solution” software.


In 2015, further project-implementation and support agreements were signed — one of which contained an arbitration clause.


The project failed due to repeated delays, prompting C&K to terminate the contract and seek a refund of ₹ 45 crore.


SAP India countered that termination was wrongful and sought ₹ 17 crore in damages.


Later, C&K initiated a fresh arbitration under Section 11 of the Arbitration Act, naming not only SAP India but also its German parent company, SAP SE, as a party — although SAP SE was not a signatory to the arbitration agreement.


C&K argued that SAP SE had actively supervised the project and thus impliedly consented to be bound by the arbitration clause.


SAP SE denied this, stating it was only a technical advisor and never a contracting party.



⚙️ Issues Before the Court
Whether non-signatories may be bound by an arbitration agreement under Indian law.


Whether the Group of Companies Doctrine forms part of Indian arbitration jurisprudence.


What degree of participation or intention must be shown to infer consent by a non-signatory.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Constitution Bench affirmed that the Group of Companies Doctrine (GoCD) forms part of Indian arbitration law and clarified its limits.
Ratio: A non-signatory may be bound by an arbitration agreement when objective evidence shows it intended to be bound, either through conduct, participation in contract performance, or involvement in negotiation and execution that demonstrates a common intention within the corporate group.
The Court held that mere corporate affiliation or assistance is not sufficient.


The inquiry must determine whether the non-signatory was directly and substantially involved in the contractual relationship giving rise to the dispute.


The Court allowed inclusion of SAP SE in the arbitration, finding that its substantive control and direct involvement implied consent to the arbitration agreement.


Accordingly, an arbitrator was appointed under Section 11 to include SAP SE as a party to the proceedings.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
Consent and Conduct — While written consent remains central under Section 7, the Court observed that in modern commercial arrangements, consent can also be inferred from objective conduct indicating participation and control over the contract.


Group as Single Economic Entity — When members of a corporate group function as a single economic unit, with common management and shared commercial objectives, the law may recognize them as a “single economic reality” for arbitral purposes.


Limitations and Safeguards — The doctrine must be applied narrowly to prevent arbitrary inclusion of non-signatories. Courts must find clear intention and direct involvement before binding them to arbitration.


Doctrine in Comparative Law — Indian law is now aligned with international practice (e.g., Dow Chemical v. Isover Saint-Gobain [ICC Case 4131/1982]) and Singapore jurisprudence recognizing GoCD under specific circumstances.


Dissent (Narasimha J.) — Cautioned that extending arbitration to non-signatories may erode party autonomy and Section 7’s requirement of “agreement in writing.” He advocated strict consent in writing to preserve contractual certainty.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court held that SAP SE’s significant role in contract management and direct participation in performance amounted to implied consent.


SAP SE was accordingly joined as a party to the arbitration.


The Court directed appointment of an arbitrator under Section 11, holding that Indian arbitration law now expressly recognizes GoCD.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
GoCD is part of Indian law: Non-signatories can be bound if their conduct shows a clear intention to be party to the arbitration agreement.


Consent remains foundational: Implied consent must be proved through active involvement or direct benefit from the contract.


Promotes commercial realism: Recognizes modern corporate groups functioning as integrated units.


Restrains over-extension: Mere ownership or association does not create arbitral liability.


Aligns Indian law with international arbitral standards and UNCITRAL principles on consent and intention.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
Chloro Controls India (P) Ltd. v. Severn Trent Water Purification Inc. (2013) – Introduced GoCD to Indian law for composite transactions.


Ameet Lalchand Shah v. Rishabh Enterprises (2018) – Expanded the scope of arbitration to inter-linked commercial agreements.


MTNL v. Canara Bank (2020) – Recognized binding effect on non-signatories based on mutual intention and common transaction.


Dow Chemical v. Isover Saint-Gobain (1982, ICC) – Seminal foreign precedent acknowledging GoCD.


Cheran Properties v. Kasturi & Sons (2018) – Held that arbitral awards can bind non-signatories if they were direct participants.



⚖️ CS-24-16 | Dablu Kujur v. State of Jharkhand (2024)
Citation: 2024 LiveLaw (SC) 227
 Date of Judgment: 12 March 2024
 Bench: Justices Bela M. Trivedi and Pankaj Mithal
 Relevant Statute:
Section 173(2), Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (CrPC) – Contents and requirements of the final police report (chargesheet).



🧩 Factual Background
The appellant, Dablu Kujur, had sought bail after the Jharkhand High Court rejected his application in connection with a murder case.
 When the matter reached the Supreme Court, the Court not only examined the merits of bail but also addressed the procedural compliance of the chargesheet filed by the investigating agency under Section 173(2) CrPC.
The Court used this opportunity to reiterate the mandatory components that a final police report (chargesheet) must contain when forwarded to the Magistrate after investigation.

⚙️ Issues Before the Court
What constitutes a valid “final report” under Section 173(2) of the CrPC?


Whether failure to comply with Section 173(2) requirements affects the court’s power to take cognizance or impacts the fairness of investigation?


Whether the accused (appellant) was entitled to bail based on alleged procedural deficiencies in the investigation report?



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court dismissed the bail appeal and held that a chargesheet is effectively the final report of the police under Section 173(2) CrPC, and must strictly adhere to the statutory requirements.
Ratio: Only a report submitted in conformity with Section 173(2) CrPC can form the lawful basis for a Magistrate to take cognizance. The report must include all the particulars prescribed under the provision and the form specified by the State Government.

💡 Key Findings / Reasoning
The Court emphasized that every police report must contain the following details under Section 173(2):
a. Names of the parties;
 b. Nature of the information;
 c. Names of persons acquainted with the case circumstances;
 d. Whether any offence appears to have been committed, and by whom;
 e. Whether the accused has been arrested;
 f. Whether the accused has been released on bond, with or without surety;
 g. Whether the accused has been forwarded in custody under Section 170 CrPC; and
 h. In cases of sexual offences, whether the medical examination report of the victim has been attached (for offences under Sections 376, 376A–E IPC).
Additionally, the Court highlighted that:
Section 172 CrPC requires that every investigating officer must maintain a case diary, recording day-to-day progress.


Sub-section (1A) mandates that statements under Section 161 CrPC be inserted in the diary.


Sub-section (1B) requires that diaries be paginated and properly maintained as a bound volume.


These procedural steps ensure transparency, accountability, and judicial scrutiny of investigations.

✅ Decision / Outcome
The bail application was denied, given the gravity of the offence and the advanced stage of trial.


The Court issued a direction to all investigating officers to ensure strict compliance with Section 173(2) when forwarding police reports to Magistrates.


It clarified that only a procedurally complete report can be treated as the basis for cognizance, and incomplete reports can compromise the fairness of criminal proceedings.



🌟 Significance / Key Takeaways
Chargesheet = Final Report: Reinforces that the “chargesheet” under common parlance is the final police report under Section 173(2) CrPC.


Mandatory particulars: Enumerates what every police report must contain before submission.


Compliance with Section 172: Reaffirms that daily case diaries and witness statements form the backbone of proper investigation records.


Fair investigation principle: Strengthens procedural integrity by ensuring courts receive complete, verified investigation reports before taking cognizance.


Administrative guidance: Serves as a reminder for investigative agencies to follow procedural law meticulously to uphold due process.



🔗 Referred / Related Provisions and Precedents
Section 173(2), CrPC – Governs police reports post-investigation; foundational for cognizance.


Section 172, CrPC – Mandates maintenance of a case diary.


Bhagwant Singh v. Commissioner of Police (1985) – Recognized the right of the informant to notice when the report recommends closure.


Union of India v. Prafulla Kumar Samal (1979) – Clarified the role of the Magistrate in assessing a police report.


State of Bihar v. Ramesh Singh (1977) – Established that chargesheets must contain sufficient material to justify cognizance.

⚖️ CS-24-17 | Devu G. Nair v. The State of Kerala (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 228
Date of Judgment: 11 March 2024
Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice J.B. Pardiwala, and Justice Manoj Misra

📘 Legal Context
The case concerns the scope of habeas corpus petitions under Article 226 when used to secure the liberty of adults in same-sex relationships, and the constitutional protection of autonomy, dignity, and identity under Articles 14, 15, and 21. It also addresses judicial sensitivity in matters involving the LGBTQ+ community and the impermissibility of counselling that seeks to alter a person’s sexual orientation.

🧩 Factual Background
The appellant, Devu G. Nair, was in a consensual same-sex relationship with another woman, referred to as “X.” Nair alleged that “X” was being unlawfully confined by her parents, who opposed their relationship, and filed a writ of habeas corpus before the Kerala High Court seeking her release.
The High Court directed the Secretary of the District Legal Services Authority (DLSA) to record “X’s” statement at her parents’ house and also ordered that “X” undergo counselling at an authorised centre.
Nair approached the Supreme Court, contending that such counselling violated “X’s” autonomy and that taking her statement in parental custody was coercive. She argued that the High Court’s directions undermined the principle of personal liberty and sexual identity, guaranteed under the Constitution.
The Supreme Court directed “X’s” parents to produce her before the Family Court, Kollam, and appointed Ms. Saleena V.G. Nair, a member of the Supreme Court e-Committee, to independently interact with “X.” The report submitted by the Family Court and Ms. Nair indicated that “X” voluntarily chose to reside with her parents, wished to focus on her career, and described the appellant as an intimate friend, not a partner she wished to live with at that time.

⚖️ Issues
Whether the habeas corpus petition filed by Devu G. Nair was maintainable to secure the liberty of her same-sex partner.


Whether the High Court erred in directing counselling for “X,” thereby interfering with her personal autonomy.


What safeguards courts must follow when handling habeas corpus petitions involving LGBTQ+ individuals.



🏛 Judgment and Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court upheld the finding that “X” was not in illegal detention and that she voluntarily chose to stay with her parents. However, it criticised the High Court’s counselling order as potentially coercive and issued broad constitutional guidelines to ensure that habeas corpus proceedings are conducted with sensitivity and respect for the autonomy and dignity of LGBTQ+ individuals.
Ratio:
Courts must respect the personal liberty, autonomy, and sexual identity of adults in consensual same-sex relationships. Counselling or judicial intervention cannot be used to modify, suppress, or question one’s sexual orientation or relationship choices.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
The Court observed that ordering counselling or supervision over the choices of consenting adults amounts to judicial paternalism and infringes upon Article 21 rights. It clarified that constitutional morality, not social morality, must guide judicial behavior.
The Court stressed that in habeas corpus cases involving intimate relationships, the judicial inquiry must end once free will is established. Judges cannot attempt to “reform,” “correct,” or “redirect” individuals based on their orientation or relationship.
The Court also recognised that the concept of family is not limited to the natal or biological family. For LGBTQ+ persons, “family” includes chosen partners and support networks. Judicial institutions must understand and respect these chosen families when dealing with liberty and protection petitions.

📜 Guidelines Issued by the Supreme Court
The Supreme Court, while disposing of the appeal, laid down comprehensive guidelines for courts and authorities to follow in similar cases:
Priority and Speed: Habeas corpus and protection petitions involving consenting adults must be given top priority to avoid delay and further unlawful confinement.


Free and Voluntary Interaction: Judges must ensure that they speak to the detainee in-camera in an atmosphere free from coercion, family pressure, or social influence.


Privacy and Safety: Proceedings must ensure confidentiality and dignity of the individuals concerned.


No Coercive Counselling: Counselling cannot aim to change the detainee’s sexual orientation or identity.


Empathy and Neutrality: Judges must remain sensitive and neutral, avoiding any homophobic or transphobic bias.


Immediate Relief: If unlawful confinement is established, the person must be released immediately and, if necessary, granted police protection.


Judicial Restraint: Courts must confine their role to determining free will, not moral judgment or “reform.”


Respect for Identity: Judges and lawyers must avoid derogatory references or assumptions about gender identity or sexuality.



✅ Decision
The Supreme Court did not interfere with the High Court’s factual finding that “X” voluntarily chose to stay with her parents. However, it set aside the counselling direction and clarified the constitutional position that courts must never use such measures to influence sexual orientation or personal choices.
The Court reaffirmed that the dignity, identity, and liberty of LGBTQ+ persons are constitutionally protected and that judicial institutions must act as guardians of autonomy, not as moral arbiters.

🌟 Significance and Key Takeaways
This judgment strengthens India’s evolving constitutional jurisprudence on sexual orientation, personal autonomy, and equality. It is one of the first Supreme Court rulings post-Navtej Singh Johar v. Union of India (2018) to apply these principles to judicial procedure, not merely criminal law.
The ruling establishes that counselling cannot override consent, and that courts must prioritise individual will over familial or societal expectations. It also broadens the meaning of family to include non-traditional and chosen relationships.

🔗 Related Precedents and Conceptual Connections
The decision builds upon key constitutional precedents:
Navtej Singh Johar v. Union of India (2018): Decriminalised same-sex relations and affirmed LGBTQ+ dignity and autonomy.


Shafin Jahan v. Asokan K.M. (2018): Held that adult individuals have an unfettered right to choose their partners.


K.S. Puttaswamy v. Union of India (2017): Recognised privacy and decisional autonomy as fundamental to Article 21.


Deepika Singh v. Central Administrative Tribunal (2022): Expanded the concept of “family” to include unmarried and non-traditional relationships.


S. Khushboo v. Kanniammal (2010): Affirmed the constitutional protection of personal life choices against moral scrutiny.



⚖️ CS-24-18 | Dolly Rani v. Manish Kumar Chanchal (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 412 | Decided on: 3 May 2024
Bench: Justice B.V. Nagarathna and Justice Augustine George Masih

📘 Legal Context & Relevant Provisions
Section 7, Hindu Marriage Act, 1955 — A Hindu marriage becomes valid only upon solemnisation by customary rites and ceremonies, including saptapadi (seven steps) where applicable.


Section 8, Hindu Marriage Act, 1955 — Permits registration of a marriage, but only after a valid marriage has already been solemnised. Registration is evidentiary, not constitutive.


Article 142, Constitution of India — Empowers the Supreme Court to issue orders or decrees to do complete justice between parties.



🧩 Factual Background
The appellant, Dolly Rani, and the respondent, Manish Kumar Chanchal, claimed to have been married in July 2021 based on a certificate issued by the “Vadik Jankalyan Samiti (Regd.)”.


However, a formal Hindu marriage ceremony, which was planned for 25 October 2022, was never performed due to disputes between the parties.


Despite the absence of a traditional ceremony, both individuals obtained a marriage registration certificate and later initiated multiple proceedings against each other — including criminal cases and petitions under the Hindu Marriage Act.


Subsequently, both parties approached the Supreme Court jointly, seeking:


A declaration that no valid marriage ever existed;


Cancellation of the registration certificates;


Quashing of all pending civil and criminal proceedings based on that marriage.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether registration under Section 8 of the Hindu Marriage Act can create a valid marriage in the absence of solemnisation as required under Section 7.


Whether the issuance of a registration certificate confers upon the parties the legal status of husband and wife.


Whether the Supreme Court can invoke Article 142 to declare such a marriage void ab initio and quash all related proceedings.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court held that solemnisation under Section 7 is a mandatory condition for a valid Hindu marriage.
Without performance of customary rites such as saptapadi, no marriage can be said to have taken place in the eyes of law.
Accordingly, registration alone does not create a marital relationship — it merely records an existing valid marriage.
Ratio: Registration under Section 8 cannot validate a marriage that was never solemnised. The ceremony is the foundation; registration is only proof.
The Court declared that the purported marriage between the parties was void ab initio, as it was never solemnised in accordance with Hindu customs.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
Sanctity of Solemnisation (Section 7)


The Court reiterated that Hindu marriage is not merely a contractual arrangement but a sacramental union (samskara).


The expression “solemnised” in Section 7 implies the performance of traditional rituals with the intention of entering into a marital relationship.


The absence of such ceremonies makes the registration a nullity, incapable of conferring legal status.


Registration as Evidentiary, Not Constitutive (Section 8)


Registration serves only to evidence an already solemnised marriage.


The Court observed an increasing misuse of registration mechanisms by individuals registering unperformed marriages for administrative or immigration purposes, warning that this undermines the sanctity of marriage laws.


Exercise of Article 142 Powers


Using its plenary powers under Article 142, the Supreme Court quashed:


The marriage registration certificate,


All pending civil and criminal proceedings, including divorce and maintenance petitions, as no legal marriage ever existed.


The Court stated that invoking Article 142 was necessary to ensure complete justice between the parties and prevent further misuse of judicial process.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court held that no valid marriage ever existed between the parties.


The purported marriage certificate was declared null and void ab initio.


All associated legal proceedings — including divorce petitions, maintenance claims, and criminal complaints — were quashed.


The Court emphasised that registration cannot substitute solemnisation, reaffirming the traditional and statutory requirements of Hindu marriage.



🌟 Significance & Key Takeaways
Reaffirms that a valid Hindu marriage must first be solemnised, not merely registered.


Clarifies that registration is evidentiary — it cannot cure the absence of rituals or ceremonies.


Prevents misuse of the marriage registration process for ulterior purposes such as property, visa, or legal advantage.


Demonstrates the Supreme Court’s use of Article 142 to prevent injustice and clarify matrimonial law.


Strengthens jurisprudence distinguishing between marriage as a social-sacramental institution and registration as a procedural formality.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
Seema v. Ashwani Kumar (2006): Directed states to make marriage registration compulsory for record purposes but did not alter the requirement of solemnisation.


Yamunabai Anantrao Adhav v. Anantrao Shivram Adhav (1988): Held that a void marriage cannot confer marital status or rights under personal law.


Kanwal Ram v. Himachal Pradesh Administration (1966): Clarified that proof of marriage requires evidence of actual solemnisation under Section 7.


Asha Rani v. Rajendra Kumar (2013): Reiterated that registration is merely proof and not validation of a marriage.


Sarla Mudgal v. Union of India (1995): Explained the importance of ceremony and intention in Hindu marriages.

⚖️ CS-24-19 | Dr. Bhim Rao Ambedkar Vichar Manch Bihar v. State of Bihar & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 SCC OnLine SC 523 | Decided on: 17 May 2024
Bench: Justice Vikram Nath and Justice Prashant Kumar Mishra

📘 Legal Context & Relevant Constitutional Provisions
Article 341, Constitution of India: Empowers the President to specify the castes, races, or tribes to be deemed as Scheduled Castes for any State or Union Territory.


Article 341(2): Provides that the list of Scheduled Castes may be modified only by Parliament, through legislation.


Article 366(24): Defines the term Scheduled Castes.


Principle of Constitutional Federalism: Limits the powers of States in modifying centrally notified Scheduled Caste or Scheduled Tribe lists.



🧩 Factual Background
The Government of Bihar, through a Resolution dated 1 July 2015, decided to merge the “Tanti-Tantwa” community, which was originally listed under the Extremely Backward Class (EBC) category, into the list of Scheduled Castes (SC).


The State issued administrative directions allowing “Tanti-Tantwa” members to avail benefits under the SC quota, even though no amendment had been enacted by Parliament to modify the Scheduled Caste list for Bihar.


The petitioner, Dr. Bhim Rao Ambedkar Vichar Manch, a socio-legal organisation, challenged this decision before the Supreme Court, arguing that:


The State had no constitutional authority to alter or expand the SC list;


The move violated Article 341(1) and 341(2); and


The resolution discriminated against genuine Scheduled Castes by illegally redistributing reservation benefits.


The State defended its decision on grounds of social justice and administrative convenience, claiming that the “Tanti-Tantwa” group shared similar socio-economic disadvantages as existing Scheduled Castes.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether a State Government has the constitutional competence to include, delete, or merge any community in the Scheduled Caste list notified under Article 341(1).


Whether the Bihar Government’s Resolution dated 01.07.2015 merging the Tanti-Tantwa community into the Scheduled Caste list was constitutionally valid.


What relief, if any, should be granted to persons who had already received benefits under the invalid resolution.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court quashed the Bihar Government’s Resolution of 01.07.2015, holding it unconstitutional and void ab initio.
The Court reaffirmed that the State Government has no power under the Constitution to alter, amend, or merge communities into the Scheduled Caste list.
Ratio: Only Parliament, by law enacted under Article 341(2)**, can modify or expand the list of Scheduled Castes. State Governments possess no executive or legislative competence to alter such lists unilaterally.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
Constitutional Scheme under Article 341:


The power to identify and notify Scheduled Castes lies solely with the President, and any modification requires a Parliamentary enactment.


Once the Presidential Notification is issued, States cannot make additions, deletions, or modifications to the notified list.


Violation of Federal Division of Powers:


The State’s resolution intruded into a Union List subject—matters relating to Scheduled Castes under Article 341 fall within the exclusive domain of Parliament.


Any such unilateral modification by a State would violate the principle of cooperative federalism and constitutional separation of powers.


Doctrine of Constitutional Supremacy:


The Constitution creates an exhaustive procedure for classification of Scheduled Castes.


Allowing States to alter the list would undermine national uniformity and consistency in reservation policies.


Equitable Relief to Affected Individuals:


The Court, acknowledging the equity principle, held that persons who had already benefited under the invalid State Resolution in good faith should not be penalised retroactively.


However, all future benefits under the Scheduled Caste quota must revert to the constitutionally recognised SC categories.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Bihar Government’s Resolution dated 1 July 2015 was declared unconstitutional and quashed.


The Court directed:


The “Tanti-Tantwa” community to be restored to their original EBC category.


All Scheduled Caste quota posts occupied by “Tanti-Tantwa” members to be returned to genuine SC categories prospectively.


The Court also instructed that no State Government shall issue administrative directions altering the SC/ST lists without a Parliamentary amendment.



🌟 Significance & Key Takeaways
Clarifies Constitutional Competence: The judgment definitively holds that States cannot alter Scheduled Caste or Scheduled Tribe lists.


Reinforces Federal Boundaries: Upholds the exclusive authority of Parliament under Article 341(2).


Protects Integrity of Reservation System: Prevents dilution of Scheduled Caste benefits through arbitrary inclusion of non-SC groups.


Ensures Equitable Transition: Balances constitutional legality with fairness to individuals who had availed benefits in good faith.


Strengthens Rule of Law: Reaffirms that constitutional procedure cannot be replaced by administrative expediency.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
State of Maharashtra v. Keshao Vishwanath Sonone (2021) 13 SCC 336: The Court held that benefits granted under an invalid government order may, on equitable grounds, be protected retrospectively to prevent undue hardship.


E.V. Chinnaiah v. State of Andhra Pradesh (2005) 1 SCC 394: Ruled that States cannot sub-classify or reorganise Scheduled Castes notified under Article 341.


B. Basavalingappa v. D. Munichinnappa (1965) 1 SCR 316: Reiterated that inclusion/exclusion in the SC list lies solely with the President and Parliament.


Indra Sawhney v. Union of India (1992) Supp (3) SCC 217: Distinguished backward class reservations from Scheduled Caste/Tribe lists, emphasising separate constitutional frameworks.


Marri Chandra Shekhar Rao v. Dean, S.G.S. Medical College (1990) 3 SCC 130: Affirmed that Scheduled Caste status is determined by residence and Presidential notification, not by State discretion.

⚖️CS-24-20 | Dr. Brajendra Singh Chauhan & Ors. v. Central Administrative Tribunal & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 SCC OnLine All 954 | Decided on: 4 June 2024
Bench: Justice Vivek Kumar Birla and Justice Donadi Ramesh

📘 Legal Context & Relevant Provisions
Section 17, Administrative Tribunals Act, 1985: Empowers the Central Administrative Tribunal (CAT) to exercise the same jurisdiction and powers as a High Court under the Contempt of Courts Act, 1971 in matters concerning its orders.


Section 19, Contempt of Courts Act, 1971: Provides for an appeal to the Supreme Court from any order or decision of a tribunal exercising contempt jurisdiction.


Articles 226 & 227, Constitution of India: Confer writ and supervisory jurisdiction on High Courts.


Article 323-A, Constitution of India: Establishes administrative tribunals for adjudicating service disputes.



🧩 Factual Background
The petitioners, including Dr. Brajendra Singh Chauhan, were selected for appointment as Assistant Medical Officers pursuant to a favourable order passed by the Central Administrative Tribunal (CAT).


When the administrative authorities allegedly failed to comply fully with the CAT’s directions, the petitioners filed a contempt petition before the CAT under Section 17 of the Administrative Tribunals Act, 1985.


The CAT, after hearing the matter, found that its earlier order had been substantially complied with and dismissed the contempt petition.


Dissatisfied, the petitioners approached the Allahabad High Court under Article 226, challenging the CAT’s dismissal of the contempt application.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether a writ petition under Article 226 is maintainable against an order of the CAT passed under contempt jurisdiction.


Whether the only remedy against such contempt orders lies in appeal to the Supreme Court under Section 19 of the Contempt of Courts Act.


Whether the scope of judicial review under Article 226 extends to orders passed by tribunals in the exercise of contempt powers.



🏛  Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Allahabad High Court dismissed the writ petition as not maintainable, holding that:
“An order passed by the Central Administrative Tribunal under its contempt jurisdiction is appealable only to the Supreme Court under Section 19 of the Contempt of Courts Act, 1971, and cannot be challenged before the High Court under Article 226.”

💡 Reasoning of the Court
Exclusive Appellate Remedy under Section 19:


The CAT derives its contempt powers from Section 17 of the Administrative Tribunals Act, which expressly equates the Tribunal’s powers to those of a High Court under the Contempt of Courts Act.


Since Section 19 of the Contempt Act provides a specific appeal mechanism to the Supreme Court, this is the exclusive statutory remedy.


Bar on Invoking Article 226 Jurisdiction:


The High Court relied on T. Sudhakar Prasad v. Government of A.P. (2001) 1 SCC 516, which held that orders passed by tribunals in contempt jurisdiction are not subject to writ interference.


Judicial review under Articles 226 and 227 cannot substitute or bypass a specific statutory appeal provided by Parliament.


L. Chandra Kumar Principle Applied:


While L. Chandra Kumar v. Union of India (1997) preserved the power of judicial review over tribunal decisions, it clarified that such review applies to decisions rendered in original jurisdiction, not contempt orders that are separately governed by statute.


Nature of Contempt Jurisdiction:


Contempt jurisdiction is quasi-criminal, aimed at enforcing the authority of the Tribunal and ensuring compliance with its orders.


Such jurisdiction operates independently from the service matter itself and is not open to collateral challenge via writ petitions.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The writ petition was dismissed as not maintainable.


The Court clarified that:


The exclusive appellate forum against a CAT contempt order lies with the Supreme Court under Section 19 of the Contempt of Courts Act, 1971.


High Courts cannot entertain writ petitions or supervisory proceedings under Articles 226/227 in such matters.


The petitioners were advised to seek remedy directly before the Supreme Court.



🌟 Significance & Key Takeaways
Clarifies appellate hierarchy: Only the Supreme Court has appellate jurisdiction over CAT’s contempt orders.


Limits writ jurisdiction: Reinforces judicial discipline — High Courts cannot re-open CAT contempt findings.


Upholds legislative intent: Parliament’s intent in Section 19 is to ensure a direct route to the Supreme Court for contempt appeals, maintaining procedural uniformity.


Distinguishes between service jurisdiction and contempt jurisdiction: CAT’s service decisions are subject to High Court judicial review, but its contempt decisions are not.


Strengthens administrative justice framework: Ensures finality and efficiency in enforcement of tribunal orders.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
T. Sudhakar Prasad v. Govt. of A.P. (2001) 1 SCC 516: Held that tribunals’ contempt powers are equivalent to those of High Courts, and appeals lie directly to the Supreme Court.


L. Chandra Kumar v. Union of India (1997) 3 SCC 261: Upheld judicial review of tribunal orders but excluded contempt jurisdiction from High Court’s purview.


Union of India v. R. Gandhi (2010) 11 SCC 1: Recognised tribunals as substitutes for High Courts within limited fields but under constitutional supervision.


Jasbir Singh v. State of Punjab (2006) 8 SCC 294: Reiterated that when a statute provides a complete mechanism for appeal, the writ remedy should not be invoked.


Baradakanta Mishra v. Registrar of Orissa High Court (1974) 1 SCC 374: Distinguished contempt jurisdiction as sui generis and autonomous.

⚖️ CS-24-21 | Frank Vitus v. Narcotics Control Bureau (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 412 | Decided on: 22 April 2024
Bench: Justice Abhay S. Oka and Justice Ujjal Bhuyan

📘 Legal Context & Relevant Provisions
Article 21, Constitution of India: Right to life and personal liberty — includes the right to privacy and fair trial.


Section 37 & 52, Narcotic Drugs and Psychotropic Substances Act, 1985:


Section 37 — limits on granting bail in NDPS cases;


Section 52 — obligations relating to arrest and forwarding of accused.


Section 437(3), Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973: Permits imposition of reasonable bail conditions to ensure attendance and prevent misuse of liberty.



🧩 Factual Background
The appellant, Frank Vitus, a Nigerian national, was arrested and prosecuted under Sections 8, 22, 23, and 29 of the NDPS Act for alleged possession, production, and trafficking of narcotic substances.


The trial court granted bail but imposed two unique conditions:


The appellant must obtain a Certificate of Assurance from the Nigerian High Commission guaranteeing his presence during trial.


He must drop a live location PIN on Google Maps to allow continuous monitoring by the Investigating Officer.


Vitus challenged these bail conditions before the Supreme Court, arguing that they were unreasonable, invasive, and violative of Article 21, as they infringed his right to privacy and imposed disproportionate restrictions.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether requiring an accused to share their live location via Google Maps constitutes an unconstitutional invasion of privacy under Article 21.


Whether mandating a foreign national to obtain a certificate of assurance from their embassy as a condition for bail is legally permissible and reasonable.


What are the permissible limits under Section 437(3) CrPC regarding conditions that may accompany a bail order?



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court partly modified the bail conditions, holding that:
The Google Maps tracking condition was unreasonable, ineffective, and violative of privacy rights under Article 21.


The requirement to obtain a certificate from the Nigerian High Commission was disproportionate and impractical for bail compliance.


Courts must ensure bail conditions are rational, proportionate, and non-intrusive, aligned with the objectives of Section 437(3) CrPC.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
On Google Maps Tracking:


The Court held that requiring the accused to drop a live PIN on Google Maps was a technically flawed and legally unsound condition.


Such tracking does not provide real-time updates or serve the purpose of ensuring attendance in trial.


It amounts to constant surveillance, violating the right to privacy as recognized in K.S. Puttaswamy v. Union of India (2017).


On Embassy Certificate Requirement:


The Court found the demand for a High Commission certificate discriminatory and excessive, particularly against foreign nationals.


While acknowledging the legitimate concern of ensuring presence, it directed less intrusive alternatives — e.g., surrendering passport, regular reporting to police, or furnishing local sureties.


It clarified that such a requirement should be case-specific, not a general rule for all foreign nationals.


On Reasonable Bail Conditions (Section 437(3) CrPC):


Bail conditions must strike a balance between individual liberty and societal interest.


Conditions that are arbitrary, onerous, or technologically unreliable are unconstitutional.


The purpose of conditions is to ensure attendance at trial and prevent obstruction of justice, not to restrict liberty beyond necessity.



✅ Decision / Outcome
The Supreme Court removed both disputed conditions:


The Google Maps PIN condition was struck down as unconstitutional.


The High Commission certificate was declared optional and to be applied only where practical.


The Court substituted these with conventional bail terms:


The appellant must surrender his passport and report weekly to the NCB office.


Any future bail conditions must comply with Section 437(3) CrPC and Article 21 safeguards.



🌟 Significance & Key Takeaways
Affirms Privacy as Core to Liberty: Any surveillance-based bail condition must meet strict tests of necessity and proportionality.


Sets Precedent on Bail Conditions for Foreign Nationals: Courts cannot impose embassy-related conditions as a rule; practicality and fairness must prevail.


Reiterates Judicial Restraint: Bail conditions must be reasonable and non-punitive — courts cannot impose measures resembling custody.


Protects the Dignity of Accused Persons: Upholds that even in NDPS cases, human rights and fair trial standards remain paramount.


Strengthens Article 21 Jurisprudence: Aligns bail jurisprudence with constitutional values of privacy, dignity, and procedural fairness.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
Kunal Kumar Tiwari v. State of Bihar (2018): On imposing conditions for bail of foreign nationals under NDPS; emphasized proportionality.


Munish Bhasin v. State (NCT of Delhi) (2009): Held that bail conditions must not be arbitrary or unnecessarily onerous.


State of A.P. v. Challa Ramakrishna Reddy (2000): Reiterated that Article 21 applies even to prisoners — liberty cannot be curtailed without fair procedure.


Supreme Court Legal Aid Committee v. Union of India (1994): Laid down liberal guidelines for granting bail to undertrial prisoners in NDPS cases.


K.S. Puttaswamy v. Union of India (2017) 10 SCC 1: Recognized privacy as a fundamental right intrinsic to dignity and liberty.


Excellent — here’s the fully reconstructed, copyright-safe, CLAT PG–standard case summary based on your provided reference (rewritten in academic style for your database):

⚖️ CS-24-22 | Gaurav Kumar v. Union of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 612 | Decided on: 12 June 2024
 Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud and Justice J.B. Pardiwala

📘 Relevant Provisions
Section 24(1)(f), Advocates Act, 1961 — fixes enrolment fees payable by law graduates seeking admission to the State Bar Council rolls: ₹600 to the State Bar Council and ₹150 to the Bar Council of India (₹100 and ₹25 respectively for SC/ST candidates).


Article 14, Constitution of India — guarantees equality before the law.


Article 19(1)(g), Constitution of India — protects the right to practise any profession, trade or occupation.



🧩 Factual Background
The petitioner, Gaurav Kumar, filed a writ petition under Article 32 challenging the practice of several State Bar Councils (SBCs) charging exorbitant enrolment fees—ranging between ₹10,000 and ₹50,000—far exceeding the statutory limits under Section 24(1)(f) of the Advocates Act, 1961.


SBCs justified the additional charges as contributions towards library funds, welfare schemes, administrative expenses, and other institutional costs.


The petitioner argued that these amounts were unauthorized and exclusionary, disproportionately burdening law graduates from economically weaker backgrounds.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether State Bar Councils can levy enrolment fees exceeding the limits prescribed in Section 24(1)(f) of the Advocates Act.


Whether miscellaneous charges—such as library or welfare fund contributions—can be made a mandatory precondition for enrolment to the State rolls.


Whether such excessive fee demands violate the fundamental rights under Articles 14 and 19(1)(g).



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court held that:
“No State Bar Council possesses authority to impose enrolment fees beyond what Parliament has prescribed under Section 24(1)(f). The legal profession must remain accessible to all; financial barriers contrary to statutory limits offend both equality and liberty.”
Accordingly, the Court struck down all enrolment fee structures that exceeded the statutory ceiling and prohibited the collection of ancillary charges as conditions for enrolment.

💡 Reasoning of the Court
Statutory Limitation (Advocates Act):


The Advocates Act expressly enumerates the permissible enrolment fee; any enhancement must emanate from legislative amendment, not administrative circulars.


SBCs, being statutory bodies, cannot expand their powers through self-regulation.


Violation of Article 14 — Equality & Inclusivity:


High enrolment fees create economic discrimination, restricting entry into the profession for less-privileged aspirants.


The Court emphasized that the Bar is an institution of service, not privilege; access must remain non-elitist.


Violation of Article 19(1)(g):


The right to practise law forms part of the constitutional guarantee under Article 19(1)(g).


Excessive or arbitrary fees constitute an unreasonable restriction, lacking legal authority under Article 19(6).


No Mandatory Miscellaneous Fees:


Contributions towards welfare or library funds may be encouraged but cannot be preconditions to enrolment.


The enrolment process must be confined strictly to statutory requisites under the Advocates Act and Rules.


Prospective Application:


The ruling operates prospectively: SBCs need not refund excess amounts already collected but must immediately adopt the prescribed statutory scale for future admissions.



✅ Decision / Directions
All State Bar Councils were directed to align enrolment fee structures with Section 24(1)(f).


SBCs may collect voluntary contributions for welfare funds but not as a condition precedent to enrolment.


The Bar Council of India (BCI) was tasked to issue uniform guidelines ensuring compliance nationwide.



🌟 Significance & Key Takeaways
Reinforces Parliamentary supremacy in regulating professional access through the Advocates Act.


Affirms that economic accessibility is integral to the right to practise law under Article 19(1)(g).


Curtails arbitrary fee imposition by State Bar Councils, promoting inclusivity within the legal profession.


Strengthens the principle that statutory bodies cannot exceed delegated authority.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
V. Sudeer v. Bar Council of India (1999) — clarified that the BCI and SBCs cannot create additional barriers inconsistent with the Advocates Act.


Indian Medical Association v. Union of India (2011) — affirmed that regulatory bodies cannot impose fees contrary to statutory prescription.


State of Maharashtra v. Indian Hotel and Restaurants Assn. (2013) — underscored proportionality of restrictions under Article 19(1)(g).


T.M.A. Pai Foundation v. State of Karnataka (2002) — linked affordability in professional access to equality principles.


Bar Council of India v. Bonnie Foi Law College (2023) — reaffirmed the statutory autonomy of BCI vis-à-vis State Councils.



⚖️ CS-24-24 | Gene Campaign v. Union of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 SCC OnLine SC 538 | Decided on: 27 May 2024
Bench: Justice B.V. Nagarathna and Justice Sanjay Karol

📘 Relevant Provisions
Article 21, Constitution of India – Right to life includes the right to a safe, healthy environment and access to safe food.


Article 48A – Directive Principle mandating protection and improvement of the environment.


Article 51A(g) – Fundamental duty of citizens to protect the natural environment.


Environment (Protection) Act, 1986, and 1989 Rules – Governing framework for the approval and environmental release of Genetically Modified (GM) organisms.


Cartagena Protocol on Biosafety, 2000 and Convention on Biological Diversity, 1992 – International environmental treaties emphasizing the precautionary principle.



🧩 Factual Background
The case arose from the Union Government’s decision on 25 October 2022, approving the environmental release of the genetically modified (GM) mustard hybrid “Dhara Mustard Hybrid-11 (DMH-11)”.


The petitioner, Gene Campaign, a non-governmental organization advocating for biodiversity and farmers’ rights, filed a writ petition under Article 32, contending that the approval violated citizens’ rights to a safe environment and health under Article 21.


It was argued that the Genetic Engineering Appraisal Committee (GEAC) granted approval without sufficient environmental assessment, stakeholder consultation, or independent peer review, contrary to the precautionary principle of environmental law.


The petition also questioned India’s compliance with its international obligations under the Cartagena Protocol on Biosafety and Convention on Biological Diversity.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the Union Government’s 2022 approval for the environmental release of GM mustard (DMH-11) complied with the Environment (Protection) Act and constitutional guarantees under Article 21.


Whether the regulatory oversight of GM crops in India satisfies the constitutional requirement of transparency, precaution, and public participation.


Whether the Supreme Court should impose a moratorium on GM crop releases pending stronger biosafety regulation and scientific review.



🏛 Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court delivered a split verdict:
Justice B.V. Nagarathna’s Opinion (for caution and reform)
Held that the approval process was procedurally flawed — the Union Government failed to consult state authorities, independent scientists, and stakeholders, and the GEAC’s evaluation lacked transparency.


Directed that the GEAC must be reconstituted with experts in ecology, biodiversity, and public health.


Stressed that the precautionary principle is binding under Article 21, requiring the State to err on the side of environmental safety where scientific uncertainty persists.


Ordered that no commercial cultivation or release of DMH-11 should occur until further expert review is conducted.


Justice Sanjay Karol’s Opinion (for regulated continuation)
Held that the Union Government’s approval was within its policy and statutory powers, as GEAC had followed procedural safeguards.


Observed that judicial intervention must respect the executive’s policy prerogative in scientific and agricultural innovation.


Permitted controlled field trials of DMH-11 under close monitoring and periodic environmental impact assessments.


Directed the GEAC to conduct independent post-release biosafety studies and ensure public disclosure of all trial data.



💡 Reasoning of the Court
Constitutional Right to Environmental Safety:


Both Justices agreed that Article 21 encompasses the right to a safe and healthy environment, but diverged on whether the 2022 approval breached it.


Precautionary Principle:


Justice Nagarathna applied it strictly, emphasizing that uncertainty demands restraint; “once ecological harm occurs, it is irreversible.”


Justice Karol applied it flexibly, balancing precaution with scientific progress and national food security concerns.


Procedural Irregularities & Public Consultation:


Justice Nagarathna found deficiencies in public participation and transparency in GEAC’s evaluation.


Justice Karol held that existing institutional mechanisms sufficiently ensured scientific scrutiny.


International Environmental Commitments:


The Court reaffirmed India’s adherence to the Cartagena Protocol, which mandates biosafety risk assessment before GMO release.



✅ Decision / Directions
Due to the split verdict, the matter was referred to a larger Bench for authoritative adjudication.


Meanwhile, the Supreme Court directed that:


The GEAC conduct a comprehensive re-evaluation of DMH-11’s biosafety data.


All future GM approvals must include independent peer review, public consultation, and real-time disclosure of safety assessments.


The Union Government must ensure post-release environmental monitoring and submit compliance reports periodically.



🌿 Significance & Key Takeaways
First major Supreme Court split verdict on GM crop regulation in India.


Reiterates that the right to a healthy environment and food safety form part of Article 21’s substantive due process.


Clarifies that judicial review applies to executive actions on biotechnology when environmental or health impacts are uncertain.


Strengthens scientific accountability, transparency, and public involvement in GMO decision-making.


Balances technological advancement with constitutional environmentalism.



🔗 Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
Vellore Citizens’ Welfare Forum v. Union of India (1996) – Introduced the precautionary principle and polluter pays principle into Indian law.


A.P. Pollution Control Board v. Prof. M.V. Nayudu (1999) – Emphasized that decisions involving complex science must err on the side of caution.


Hanuman Laxman Aroskar v. Union of India (2020) – Stressed the importance of procedural integrity and stakeholder participation in environmental clearances.


Himachal Pradesh Bus-Stand Management Authority v. Central Empowered Committee (2021) – Reaffirmed judicial responsibility in enforcing environmental compliance.


M.C. Mehta v. Union of India (1987) – Expanded Article 21 to include environmental protection and ecological balance.


Perfect ✅ — thank you for the official reference material.
Here’s the final, factually accurate, copyright-safe, CLAT-PG–ready case summary for:

⚖️ 
CS-24-25 | Goa Foundation v. State of Goa & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 LiveLaw (SC) 61 | Decided on: 24 January 2024
Bench: Justice B.R. Gavai, Justice Aravind Kumar, and Justice Prashant Kumar Mishra

📘 
Relevant Provisions
Forest (Conservation) Act, 1980 (FCA) – Section 2: Restricts the use of forest land for non-forest purposes without prior approval of the Central Government.


Article 48A, Constitution of India – Directs the State to protect and improve the environment and safeguard forests.


Article 51A(g) – Fundamental duty of every citizen to protect the natural environment.


Article 21 – Recognizes the right to a clean and healthy environment as part of the right to life.



🧩 
Factual Background
The case arose from a long-standing dispute over the criteria for identifying and classifying “forests” in the State of Goa for the purpose of applying the Forest (Conservation) Act, 1980.


The National Green Tribunal (NGT) had earlier dismissed a plea filed by Goa Foundation, noting that the issue of defining “forest” was already being considered by the Supreme Court in the ongoing T.N. Godavarman Thirumulpad v. Union of India proceedings.


Goa Foundation, however, challenged the State’s 2016 criteria for identifying private forests, arguing that the criteria excluded areas of natural vegetation with lower canopy density (0.1–0.4) and thus allowed large-scale deforestation and mining under the guise of non-forest classification.


The State of Goa maintained that its criteria were consistent with ecological parameters recognized in earlier judicial and expert committee reports.



⚖️ 
Issues Before the Court
Whether areas with natural vegetation having tree canopy density between 0.1 to 0.4 should be classified as “forest” under the Forest (Conservation) Act, 1980.


Whether the criteria for identification of forests in Goa were arbitrary or contrary to directions in T.N. Godavarman and subsequent environmental jurisprudence.



🏛 
Judgment / Ratio Decidendi
The Supreme Court upheld the criteria adopted by the State of Goa, holding that they were scientifically sound, reasonable, and consistent with existing precedents and policies.
“The existing criteria based on forest tree composition, contiguity of forest land, minimum area of five hectares, and a canopy density not less than 0.4 are adequate and valid for the purpose of identifying forests in Goa.”
The Court thus affirmed the NGT’s order, finding no reason to modify or expand the criteria to include areas with canopy density below 0.4.

💡 
Reasoning of the Court
Finality of Criteria:


The issue of forest identification in Goa had reached finality through prior orders in the Godavarman case.


The criteria — (a) forest tree composition, (b) contiguity, (c) minimum area of 5 hectares, and (d) canopy density ≥ 0.4 — were scientifically validated and administratively implementable.


Ecological Consistency:


The Court observed that defining forests too broadly to include all vegetated areas (e.g., canopy density of 0.1–0.4) would lead to impracticable enforcement and hinder legitimate land use and development under existing environmental safeguards.


Precedential Authority:


Referred to T.N. Godavarman Thirumulpad v. Union of India (1997), which expanded the definition of forest to include all statutorily recognized forests, whether reserved or otherwise.


Reiterated Lafarge Umiam Mining Pvt. Ltd. v. Union of India (2011), where the Court directed all States to formulate uniform, scientifically informed forest identification criteria before granting clearances.


Balance Between Conservation and Governance:


The Court emphasized that forest conservation policy must balance ecological preservation with rational administrative boundaries, ensuring both environmental and socio-economic sustainability.



✅ 
Decision / Directions
The Supreme Court upheld the State’s forest identification criteria as valid.


Declared that no modification was required, and that canopy density of 0.4 remains the appropriate threshold for defining forest areas under the FCA.


Affirmed that forest identification and demarcation must follow the principles evolved in T.N. Godavarman and subsequent monitoring processes by the Central Empowered Committee (CEC).



🌿 
Significance & Key Takeaways
Reaffirms the scientific approach to forest identification and the importance of canopy density in ecological classification.


Ensures legal certainty and administrative consistency in forest management within the Goa region.


Clarifies that environmental protection under Article 21 and Article 48A must operate within the bounds of scientific criteria and judicially recognized standards.


Reinforces the continuing jurisdictional relevance of the Godavarman series in all forest-related matters.



🔗 
Referred / Related Cases and Their Significance
T.N. Godavarman Thirumulpad v. Union of India (1997) – Expanded the definition of “forest” under Section 2 of the FCA and established continuous judicial monitoring of forest matters.


Lafarge Umiam Mining Pvt. Ltd. v. Union of India (2011) – Directed States to prepare comprehensive guidelines for forest identification and clearance.


M.C. Mehta v. Union of India (1987) – Recognized environmental protection as part of the right to life under Article 21.


Hanuman Laxman Aroskar v. Union of India (2020) – Reaffirmed the need for procedural rigor in environmental clearances.



⚖️ CS-24-26 | Government of NCT of Delhi v. Office of Lieutenant Governor of Delhi (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 578 | Decided on: 5 August 2024
Bench: Chief Justice (Dr.) D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice P.S. Narasimha, Justice J.B. Pardiwala

🧭 Relevant Provisions
Article 239AA(4), Constitution of India – Defines the powers of the Lieutenant Governor (LG) and Council of Ministers of the NCT of Delhi.


Article 239AA(7) – Empowers Parliament to make laws to give effect to the provisions of Article 239AA.


Section 3(3)(b)(i), Delhi Municipal Corporation Act, 1957 (DMC Act) – Authorises the LG to nominate ten persons to the Municipal Corporation of Delhi (MCD).


Entry 5, List II (State List) – Local government, including municipalities.



🧩 Background of the Case
The Municipal Corporation of Delhi (MCD) comprises 250 elected councillors and 10 nominated members.


Under Section 3(3)(b)(i) of the DMC Act, the Lieutenant Governor nominates ten persons with special knowledge in municipal administration.


After the 2022 MCD elections, where the Aam Aadmi Party won a majority, the LG nominated ten members without consulting the Delhi Government.


The Government of NCT of Delhi (GNCTD) filed a writ petition under Article 32, arguing that the LG was bound by the aid and advice of the Council of Ministers when making such nominations.



⚖️ Legal Issue
Whether the Lieutenant Governor is bound by the aid and advice of the Delhi Government’s Council of Ministers when nominating members to the MCD under Section 3(3)(b)(i) of the DMC Act, 1957.

🧠 Petitioner’s Arguments (Delhi Government)
The Delhi Government argued that Article 239AA(4) makes the LG bound by the aid and advice of the elected Council of Ministers in all matters where the Delhi Legislative Assembly can make laws.


Since the MCD deals with “local government” under Entry 5 of List II, the LG must act on ministerial advice.


Unilateral nominations by the LG violate representative democracy, constitutional morality, and the 2018 Constitution Bench ruling in NCT of Delhi v. Union of India (2018).



⚖️ Respondent’s Arguments (Union of India / LG)
The DMC Act is a law enacted by Parliament, and Article 239AA(4) allows the LG to act in his discretion where a law so requires.


Since Section 3(3)(b)(i) specifically empowers the LG to nominate members, it creates a statutory exception to the general rule of aid and advice.


The LG’s nominations are not administrative actions, but statutory duties under the DMC Act — thus, they fall outside ministerial control.



🏛️ 
Judgment (Authored by Justice P.S. Narasimha)
The Supreme Court dismissed the Delhi Government’s plea and held that:
The LG is not bound by the aid and advice of the Council of Ministers when nominating ten members to the MCD under Section 3(3)(b)(i) of the DMC Act.


The DMC Act is a law enacted by Parliament under Article 239AA(7) and Entry 5 of List II, governing local government functions.


Once Parliament enacts a law on a matter within the legislative competence of Delhi, the executive power of the Delhi Government becomes subject to that law (¶15, ¶22).


Article 239AA(4) expressly provides an exception allowing the LG to act in his discretion “when required by or under any law.”


Thus, since the DMC Act authorizes the LG directly, he acts in his statutory discretion, not on ministerial advice.



🧩 
Key Reasoning
Distinction from the 2018 NCT Case:

 The Court reaffirmed that while the LG is generally bound by the Council of Ministers’ advice, this case is distinguishable because the DMC Act creates a specific statutory duty for the LG to nominate members.


Effect of Parliamentary Law:

 Once Parliament legislates on a matter (here, municipal administration), the Delhi Government’s authority under Article 239AA must yield to that law’s provisions.


Different Status from Governors:

 The LG’s powers differ from those of a State Governor. The Governor’s discretion is constitutional, while the LG’s discretion can also arise from a statute (¶21, ¶37).



📚 
Ratio Decidendi
The Lieutenant Governor of Delhi is not bound by the aid and advice of the Council of Ministers when performing a statutory function under a law enacted by Parliament, such as nominating members under Section 3(3)(b)(i) of the DMC Act.

🔗 
Referred / Related Cases
State (NCT of Delhi) v. Union of India (2018 INSC 577) – LG must ordinarily act on the aid and advice of the Council of Ministers.


Government of NCT of Delhi v. Union of India (2023 INSC 517) – Executive control over “services” remains with the Delhi Government except for reserved subjects.


Shamsher Singh v. State of Punjab (1974) – Limits of discretionary powers of constitutional heads.


S.R. Bommai v. Union of India (1994) – Federalism as a basic structure of the Constitution.



🧾 
Significance
Clarifies the constitutional relationship between the LG and the Delhi Government.


Distinguishes between constitutional discretion (under Article 163) and statutory discretion (under Article 239AA(4)).


Strengthens the doctrine of legislative supremacy of Parliament over the NCT of Delhi.


Balances representative democracy with administrative practicality in Union Territories.



🏁 
Conclusion
The Supreme Court upheld the Lieutenant Governor’s power of nomination under the DMC Act, ruling that it is a statutory function falling within the discretionary exception under Article 239AA(4).
The decision reinforces Parliament’s supremacy in matters relating to Union Territories, even where there is an elected government, reaffirming the unique federal structure envisaged for Delhi.

⚖️ CS-24-27 | High Court Bar Association, Allahabad v. State of Uttar Pradesh (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 150 | Decided on: 29 February 2024
Bench: Chief Justice (Dr.) D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice Abhay S. Oka, Justice J.B. Pardiwala, Justice Pankaj Mithal, and Justice Manoj Misra

🧭 
Relevant Provisions
Article 142 – Power of the Supreme Court to do “complete justice.”


Article 226 – Power of High Courts to issue writs.


Article 227 – Power of superintendence of High Courts over subordinate courts.


Principles of Natural Justice – Right to fair hearing before any adverse judicial order.



🧩 
Background
The case arose from the Supreme Court’s 2018 judgment in Asian Resurfacing of Road Agency v. Central Bureau of Investigation (2018 INSC 282), where a three-judge bench directed that:
Any stay order passed by a High Court in civil or criminal matters would automatically expire after six months unless extended by a reasoned order.


High Courts should decide all such matters within six months on a day-to-day basis.


On 1 December 2023, a later bench of the Supreme Court (CJI Chandrachud, JJ. Pardiwala, and Misra) referred the correctness of these directions to a Constitution Bench, expressing doubts about whether Asian Resurfacing’s blanket directions were constitutionally valid.

⚖️ 
Questions Before the Court
Can the Supreme Court direct that all interim orders of High Courts automatically lapse after a fixed period, such as six months?


Can the Supreme Court, under Article 142, direct all High Courts to dispose of pending cases within a fixed timeframe?



⚖️ 
Judgment
The five-judge Constitution Bench unanimously overruled parts of the 2018 Asian Resurfacing judgment, holding that the automatic expiry of interim orders and mandatory time-bound hearings are impermissible and beyond the scope of Article 142.
Judgment authored by: Justice Abhay S. Oka.


Concurring opinion: Justice Pankaj Mithal.



🧠 
Key Findings and Legal Reasoning
1️⃣ 
Automatic expiration of stay orders violates natural justice
Interim orders cannot lapse automatically without giving the affected party a right to be heard.


The 2018 directions ignored the merits and context of each case and punished litigants for delays beyond their control.


Justice Mithal added that an interim stay can only end if the opposite side files an application and the court passes a reasoned order following due process.


🏛️ “Automatic expiry of judicial orders without hearing violates fundamental fairness and procedural due process.”

2️⃣ 
Limits on Article 142 powers
The Supreme Court’s power under Article 142 is not unlimited; it must be exercised only to do complete justice between the parties before it, not to create general procedural mandates for all courts.


Article 142 cannot be used to:


Nullify existing judicial orders validly passed by High Courts.


Affect substantive rights of litigants who were not parties to the original proceedings.


Override established statutory or constitutional frameworks.


🏛️ “Article 142 does not authorise judicial legislation or universal directions which alter rights of non-parties.”

3️⃣ 
High Courts are not subordinate to the Supreme Court
The Court reaffirmed that High Courts are constitutional courts, not “judicially subordinate” to the Supreme Court.


Under Article 227, High Courts have supervisory jurisdiction over subordinate courts, including the power to grant or vacate interim stays.


Imposing blanket restrictions or deadlines on High Court proceedings encroaches upon judicial independence.



4️⃣ 
Time-bound directions to High Courts only in exceptional cases
Directions prescribing fixed timeframes for disposal of cases may only be issued in exceptional categories of cases, where delay undermines justice.


Otherwise, such orders amount to judicial legislation, which is constitutionally impermissible.


Each High Court is best suited to manage its own docket and determine case priorities.



📚 
Ratio Decidendi
An interim stay granted by a High Court cannot automatically expire after any fixed period. The Supreme Court cannot, under Article 142, issue blanket directions to subordinate constitutional courts imposing deadlines or limiting their jurisdiction. Each High Court retains discretion to manage its cases consistent with natural justice and judicial independence.

🔗 
Referred / Related Cases
Asian Resurfacing of Road Agency v. CBI (2018 INSC 282) – Overruled in part; automatic expiry of interim stays struck down.


Union Carbide Corporation v. Union of India (1991) – Scope and limits of Article 142 discussed.


Supreme Court Bar Association v. Union of India (1998) 4 SCC 409 – Article 142 cannot contravene substantive statutory provisions.


A.R. Antulay v. R.S. Nayak (1988) – Due process and fair trial rights upheld against procedural shortcuts.


L. Chandra Kumar v. Union of India (1997) – Reaffirmed the High Court’s constitutional independence and judicial review power.



🧭 
Key Principles Established
Principle of Natural Justice: No judicial order can lapse without a fair hearing.


Judicial Independence: High Courts are not subject to administrative directions from the Supreme Court.


Doctrine of Separation of Powers: The Supreme Court cannot legislate procedural time limits.


Limited Scope of Article 142: It applies only to particular parties before the Court, not to all cases nationwide.



🏛 
Significance
Reasserts the independence of High Courts and their freedom from procedural micromanagement by the Supreme Court.


Clarifies that Article 142 cannot be used as a tool of judicial legislation.


Protects the right to fair hearing and natural justice for litigants across India.


Balances judicial efficiency with constitutional due process.



🏁 
Conclusion
The Supreme Court in High Court Bar Association, Allahabad v. State of Uttar Pradesh (2024) reaffirmed that justice cannot be administered mechanically or through automatic procedural lapses.
The decision restores judicial autonomy to High Courts, ensures that interim orders remain valid until judicially modified, and defines the constitutional limits of Article 142 to prevent overreach.


⚖️ CS-24-28 | In Re: Alleged Rape and Murder of Trainee Doctor in RG Kar Medical College Hospital, Kolkata and Related Issues (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 613 | Decided on: August 20, 2024
Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud, Justice J.B. Pardiwala, Justice Manoj Misra
Type: Suo Motu Cognizance by Supreme Court

📜 
Relevant Statute
The Sexual Harassment of Women at Workplace (Prevention, Prohibition and Redressal) Act, 2013, particularly Section 19, which imposes a duty on employers to ensure a safe working environment for women.


Article 21 of the Constitution of India – Right to life, dignity, and safety.


Article 32 – Power of the Supreme Court to issue directions for enforcement of fundamental rights.



🧩 
Background
This case arose from a horrific incident at the RG Kar Medical College and Hospital, Kolkata, where a 31-year-old postgraduate medical trainee was found murdered and allegedly raped inside a seminar room after a 36-hour duty shift.
The brutal nature of the crime, coupled with the unauthorised sharing of the victim’s name and images on social media, triggered nationwide outrage and protests by the medical fraternity, demanding safer working environments.
Multiple writ petitions were filed before the Calcutta High Court, calling for a court-monitored investigation into the crime and the institutional failure of the hospital’s authorities — including the principal and administrative staff — in ensuring basic safety measures.
Given the nationwide implications, the Supreme Court took suo motu cognizance of the matter under Article 32, clubbing it with connected petitions to address the broader systemic issue of safety, dignity, and working conditions of doctors and healthcare workers.

⚖️ 
Key Issues
Whether hospitals and public health institutions have complied with their statutory obligations under Section 19 of the POSH Act, 2013 to ensure safety at the workplace.


What measures are required to safeguard the lives, dignity, and professional security of medical practitioners across India.


Whether the Court should establish a national-level framework to monitor safety and welfare in medical institutions.



🧠 
Observations of the Supreme Court
The Bench expressed grave concern over the alarming absence of workplace safety mechanisms in hospitals, particularly for women doctors working late shifts and in emergency wards.


The Court condemned the circulation of the victim’s name and graphic images online, emphasizing that it violated her posthumous dignity and privacy under Article 21.


The Bench observed that the medical profession cannot function in fear, and the State is duty-bound to provide a secure and dignified environment to those who save lives.


The Court acknowledged the doctors’ protests nationwide and appealed to the medical community to resume work, assuring judicial intervention to guarantee their safety and well-being.



🧾 
Order / Directions Issued
Constitution of a National Task Force (NTF):


The Court set up an NTF comprising eminent doctors from across India to recommend and oversee institutional reforms in hospital safety, working conditions, and welfare.


The NTF’s mandate includes:


Reviewing hospital safety infrastructure.


Ensuring compliance with POSH Act, 2013.


Recommending standardised working-hour limits and grievance redressal mechanisms.


Data Collection by Centre and States:


Directed all State and Union Territory Governments, through their respective Health Secretaries, and the Union Ministry of Health & Family Welfare to collect and report detailed data from every government hospital on:


Number of security personnel deployed in hospitals and departments.


Existence of Internal Complaints Committees (ICCs) under POSH Act.


Workplace safety protocols for women staff and night-shift employees.


CBI Investigation Monitoring:


The Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) was instructed to file a status report by August 22, 2024, detailing progress in the criminal investigation into the RG Kar Hospital incident.


Institutional Responsibility:


The Bench directed the hospital authorities to cooperate fully with the investigation and disciplinary proceedings against erring officials.



📚 
Ratio Decidendi
“The right to life under Article 21 encompasses the right to safety, dignity, and security at the workplace. The State and institutional authorities have a constitutional and statutory obligation to ensure that healthcare professionals, especially women, can perform their duties without fear, harassment, or violence.”

🔗 
Referred / Related Cases
Medha Kotwal Lele v. Union of India (2013) 1 SCC 297 – Directed strict compliance with Vishaka guidelines and establishment of Internal Complaints Committees under POSH Act.


Vishaka v. State of Rajasthan (1997) 6 SCC 241 – Recognised workplace sexual harassment as a violation of Articles 14, 15, and 21.


Nipun Saxena v. Union of India (2019) 2 SCC 703 – Prohibited disclosure of rape victims’ identities and photographs.


Occupational Health and Safety Association v. Union of India (2014) – Affirmed State’s duty to provide safe working environments.



💡 
Significance
Landmark suo motu action expanding Article 21 to cover workplace safety and dignity of medical professionals.


Establishes the first National Task Force dedicated to hospital safety reforms.


Strengthens enforcement of the POSH Act, 2013 in medical and institutional workplaces.


Reinforces victim privacy and posthumous dignity as constitutional rights.



🏁 
Conclusion
The Supreme Court’s intervention in In Re: Alleged Rape and Murder of Trainee Doctor in RG Kar Medical College Hospital, Kolkata (2024) marked a turning point in the judicial protection of women healthcare professionals.
By taking suo motu cognizance and creating a national oversight mechanism, the Court underscored that justice extends beyond punishment—it requires systemic reform to make workplaces truly safe, dignified, and equitable.

Here’s the complete, copyright-compliant and CLAT PG–style case summary of the recent suo motu judgment:

⚖️ 
CS-24-29 | In Re: Directions in the Matter of Demolition of Structures (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 866 | Decided on: December 2024
Bench: Justice B.R. Gavai, Justice K.V. Viswanathan
Type: Suo Motu Public Interest Case

📜 
Constitutional & Legal Provisions Involved
Article 21, Constitution of India – Right to life includes the right to shelter and dignity.


Article 14, Constitution of India – Protection against arbitrary and discriminatory state action.


Article 142, Constitution of India – Supreme Court’s power to do complete justice.


Principles of Natural Justice – Requirement of notice, hearing, and reasoned decisions before any deprivation of property or housing.



🧩 
Background
This suo motu case was triggered by a series of state-authorized bulldozer demolitions across India, often carried out immediately after individuals were accused of criminal offences. The issue gained national attention after the demolition of the residence of Rashid Khan in Rajasthan, allegedly linked to the actions of his tenant’s son.
Petitioners argued that such demolitions were being used as punitive tools, targeting certain communities and individuals without following due process of law, violating Articles 14 and 21 of the Constitution.
The Supreme Court, recognizing the pattern of executive overreach, took suo motu cognizance to issue nationwide procedural guidelines aimed at protecting citizens against arbitrary demolitions.

⚖️ 
Issues for Determination
Can bulldozer demolitions be used as punitive measures against accused individuals?


What constitutional safeguards and procedures must precede any demolition action?


How can the Court ensure transparency, fairness, and accountability in future demolition exercises by state authorities?



🧠 
Court’s Observations & Reasoning
On Rule of Law & Separation of Powers:

 The Court reiterated that demolition cannot be used as punishment, since the power to punish rests exclusively with the judiciary. Any executive action imposing punitive consequences without trial violates the doctrine of separation of powers.


On Arbitrary State Action:

 Arbitrary bulldozer drives carried out against accused individuals and their families violate Articles 14 and 21, as they constitute disproportionate state retaliation and collective punishment.


On the Right to Shelter:

 The Court expanded the right to life under Article 21 to reaffirm that the right to shelter is an intrinsic part of human dignity. Evicting or demolishing homes without due process offends both constitutional and humanitarian principles.


On Procedural Safeguards:

 The Court emphasized that the principles of natural justice—notice, hearing, and reasoned orders—must form the foundation of all administrative demolition actions.



📚 
Precedents Relied Upon
Indira Nehru Gandhi v. Raj Narain (1976)

 – Reaffirmed judicial supremacy in adjudication. The Court invoked this to hold that demolitions cannot serve as de facto punishment bypassing the courts.


Nilabati Behera v. State of Orissa (1993)

 – Established public accountability for rights violations. Applied here to hold officials personally liable for unconstitutional demolitions.


State of Uttar Pradesh v. Jeet S. Bisht (2007)

 – Recognized the Supreme Court’s power to issue guidelines to secure fundamental rights. Used to justify the pan-India procedural framework for demolitions.



🧾 
Ratio Decidendi
Bulldozer demolitions conducted as punitive or retaliatory actions, without notice, hearing, and adherence to procedure, are unconstitutional and violative of Articles 14 and 21.
The right to shelter, as an aspect of human dignity, cannot be curtailed without following due process and ensuring proportionality.

🧱 
Key Directions / Guidelines Issued (Pan-India)
Notice & Hearing:


Written notice must be issued at least 15 days prior to any demolition, detailing the alleged violations.


The affected individual must be given an opportunity for a personal hearing.


Digital Transparency:


Municipal and development authorities must maintain a public digital portal listing all demolition notices, orders, and appeals.


Proportionality Check:


Demolition shall be a last resort, permissible only if compounding or partial correction is not possible.


Video Documentation:


All demolition operations must be videographed and reports uploaded publicly for transparency.


Accountability Mechanism:


Officials violating these directions shall face personal liability, contempt proceedings, and mandatory restitution for damages caused.


Protection Against Collective Punishment:


Demolitions targeted at accused individuals or their families without legal sanction are discriminatory and unconstitutional.



🧩 
Held
Bulldozer demolitions linked to criminal allegations without adherence to procedure are punitive and unconstitutional.


Due process and notice are indispensable components of Article 21.


Right to shelter and dignity form part of the basic structure of constitutional governance.


Pan-India procedural guidelines were issued to prevent future violations and ensure transparency and accountability.



🔗 
Significance
Reinforces constitutional morality and the rule of law against arbitrary executive actions.


Recognizes housing and shelter as a component of fundamental human dignity.


Establishes binding national guidelines to prevent collective punishment and discriminatory demolitions.


Strengthens judicial oversight under Article 142 to ensure complete justice.



💬 Key Takeaway
This judgment in In Re: Directions in the Matter of Demolition of Structures (2024) marks a turning point in constitutional governance, ensuring that no citizen can be deprived of shelter or dignity by administrative fiat.
The Court firmly reiterated that justice must be procedural as well as substantive, and state power must always yield to due process.

⚖️ CS-24-30 | In Re: Patanjali Ayurved Limited through its Managing Director Acharya Balkrishna and Baba Ramdev (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 605
Date of Judgment: August 13, 2024
Bench: Justice Hima Kohli and Justice Ahsanuddin Amanullah
Type: Suo Motu Contempt Proceedings (Public Interest)

📜 Relevant Provisions
The Constitution of India, 1950


Article 32 – Power of the Supreme Court to enforce Fundamental Rights.


Article 129 – Supreme Court’s power to punish for contempt of itself.


The Drugs and Magic Remedies (Objectionable Advertisements) Act, 1954 – Sections 3 & 4 prohibit misleading medical advertisements and claims.


The Drugs and Magic Remedies (Objectionable Advertisements) Rules, 1955 – Rule 6 outlines the conditions for medical advertisements.


Contempt of Courts Act, 1971 – Defines civil and criminal contempt and related penalties.



🧩 Background of the Case
The case originated from a petition filed by the Indian Medical Association (IMA) before the Supreme Court, alleging that Patanjali Ayurved Limited was publishing misleading advertisements attacking modern medicine and making unverified claims about curing chronic diseases.
In November 2023, following the Court’s direction, Patanjali had voluntarily assured that it would refrain from publishing any misleading advertisements that disparaged modern medicine or made unsubstantiated therapeutic claims.
However, despite this assurance, subsequent advertisements and press conferences were released, featuring Baba Ramdev and Acharya Balkrishna, continuing the same claims. Viewing this as a wilful breach of undertaking, the Supreme Court issued contempt notices to both individuals and directed their personal appearance before the Court.

⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the actions and statements of Patanjali Ayurved and its officials amounted to a wilful and contumacious breach of the undertaking given to the Supreme Court?


Whether such misleading advertisements violated the Drugs and Magic Remedies (Objectionable Advertisements) Act, 1954, and constituted civil contempt of court orders?



🧠 Court’s Analysis & Ratio
Wilful Breach and Contempt Jurisdiction:

 The Court examined whether Patanjali’s conduct amounted to a wilful breach of its previous undertaking. It noted that while the advertisements were indeed in violation of the earlier assurance, the contemnors expressed unqualified apology and took steps to prevent recurrence.


Statutory Compliance:

 The Court reiterated that Sections 3 and 4 of the 1954 Act explicitly prohibit false or misleading advertisements relating to diseases and magical cures. Companies are under a legal and ethical duty to comply with these provisions, and violations could attract both statutory penalties and contempt consequences.


Judicial Caution and Warning:

 Emphasizing judicial restraint, the Court decided to accept the apologies of the contemnors, noting their public acknowledgment of fault. However, it issued a stern caution that any future violation of the undertaking or continuation of misleading claims would attract severe consequences under the Contempt of Courts Act.



🧾 Judgment (Held)
“Given the attendant facts and circumstances of the case and the effort made by the proposed contemnors to absolve themselves of acts that amounted to breach of undertakings given to this Court, we are inclined to accept the apology tendered by them and close the matter.”
— Justice Hima Kohli
The Supreme Court closed the contempt proceedings against Patanjali Ayurved Limited, its Managing Director Acharya Balkrishna, and co-founder Baba Ramdev, after accepting their written apologies.
However, the Court issued a strict warning that any future dishonouring of the undertaking or similar conduct would be treated with utmost seriousness and could invite grave punitive action.

⚖️ Ratio Decidendi
Misleading advertisements about medical cures constitute a violation of statutory obligations under the Drugs and Magic Remedies Act, 1954, and breach of judicial undertakings amounts to civil contempt.


The Supreme Court’s power under Article 129 enables it to ensure compliance with its orders and maintain public confidence in judicial authority.


However, judicial leniency may be exercised where the contemnors show genuine remorse and corrective intent.



🧩 Significance of the Judgment
Reaffirms the constitutional sanctity of undertakings given to the Court.


Reinforces judicial intolerance toward misleading health-related claims affecting public safety.


Emphasizes the need for truthful commercial speech, balancing freedom of trade (Article 19(1)(g)) with consumer protection and public health.


Strengthens the role of the judiciary in curbing medical misinformation under the Drugs and Magic Remedies Act.



🔗 Key Takeaways
Contempt Jurisdiction (Article 129): The Supreme Court can act suo motu to enforce compliance with its orders.


False Advertisements: Misleading or exaggerated health claims violate Sections 3 and 4 of the 1954 Act.


Apology and Remorse: A sincere apology may mitigate contempt consequences, but recurrence will invite stricter judicial action.


Ethical Advertising: Commercial entities in health sectors are constitutionally bound to protect public faith and scientific integrity.



💬 In Essence
This case reinforces the judiciary’s role as a guardian of public accountability. By balancing punishment with corrective restraint, the Supreme Court reaffirmed that freedom of trade cannot override public health, and undertakings before courts must be honoured in both letter and spirit.

⚖️ CS-24-31 | In Re: Right to Privacy of Adolescents (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 614
Date of Judgment: August 20, 2024
Bench: Justice Abhay S. Oka and Justice Ujjal Bhuyan
Type: Suo Motu Criminal Appeal & Judicial Review of High Court Judgment

📜 Relevant Provisions
Constitution of India, 1950


Article 226 — Power of High Courts to issue writs.


Article 32 — Enforcement of Fundamental Rights.


Indian Penal Code, 1860 (IPC)


Sections 363, 366 — Kidnapping and abduction.


Sections 376(2)(n), 376(3) — Rape of a minor and repeated sexual assault.


Protection of Children from Sexual Offences (POCSO) Act, 2012


Section 6 — Aggravated penetrative sexual assault.


Juvenile Justice (Care and Protection of Children) Act, 2015 (JJ Act)


Section 2(14) — Definition of “child in need of care and protection.”


Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 (Cr.P.C)


Section 482 — Inherent powers of High Courts.



🧩 Factual Background
A 14-year-old girl was reported missing by her mother in May 2018, later found cohabiting with a 25-year-old man, with whom she subsequently had a child.


The Special POCSO Court convicted the accused under Sections 6 of the POCSO Act, 376(2)(n) and 376(3) IPC (rape of a minor), and 363, 366 IPC (kidnapping and abduction), sentencing him to 20 years’ rigorous imprisonment.


The Calcutta High Court (October 2023) set aside the conviction for rape and POCSO offences under Article 226 read with Section 482 Cr.P.C, holding the relationship to be “romantic” and “non-exploitative.” The Court also made general observations on teenage relationships, advising adolescent girls to “control their urges.”


The Supreme Court took suo motu cognizance (December 2023), finding the High Court’s reasoning and remarks inappropriate and contrary to the POCSO framework.



⚖️ Issues Before the Court
Whether the High Court was justified in using its discretionary powers under Article 226 and Section 482 Cr.P.C. to set aside a conviction under the POCSO Act and IPC?


Whether “consensual relationships” between minors can form an exception to offences under the POCSO Act?


Whether judicial remarks about adolescent morality and sexual conduct are permissible in a criminal judgment?



🧠 Court’s Analysis & Ratio
1️⃣ 
No exception for “consensual acts” under the POCSO Act
The Supreme Court firmly held that the POCSO Act recognizes no concept of “non-exploitative sexual acts” with minors.


Any sexual act with a person below 18 years is statutorily rape, regardless of the alleged “consent” or romantic nature of the relationship.


The High Court’s reference to “older adolescents” and its sociological commentary were found wholly irrelevant and contrary to legislative intent.


The Court reiterated that courts cannot override statutory mandates through equitable or moral reasoning (¶16–19).


2️⃣ 
Improper use of discretionary powers
The bench criticized the High Court’s exercise of powers under Article 226 and Section 482 Cr.P.C., noting that serious offences like rape cannot be quashed even if the parties later reconcile or marry.


Judicial discretion must align with the statute; it cannot nullify express provisions of penal law (¶21–23.1).


The purpose of the POCSO Act is to protect children from sexual exploitation, in harmony with India’s obligations under the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child (1992).


3️⃣ 
Obligations of the State under the JJ Act
The Court observed that the State Government failed to provide rehabilitation and protection to the victim, as mandated under Section 2(14) JJ Act.


It directed the constitution of a committee including a clinical psychologist and a social scientist to assist the victim in rehabilitation.


The Child Welfare Committees (CWCs) must ensure care, counselling, and reintegration for victims of sexual offences (¶28–29).


4️⃣ 
Judicial restraint and judgment writing
The Supreme Court censured the High Court’s personal moral observations on teenage sexuality, calling them unwarranted and paternalistic.


Judicial pronouncements must be objective, concise, and reasoned, avoiding personal commentary or policy advice (¶13–17).



🧾 
Judgment (Held)
The Supreme Court restored the conviction of the accused under Section 6 POCSO Act and Sections 376(2)(n) & 376(3) IPC for rape of a minor.


The acquittal under Sections 363 and 366 IPC (kidnapping) was upheld as the victim had voluntarily left home.


The Court reaffirmed that “consensual” relations with a minor are legally rape under POCSO and IPC.


The judgment was authored by Justice Abhay S. Oka.



⚖️ 
Ratio Decidendi
Consent is immaterial under POCSO — any sexual act with a person below 18 is an offence, even in “romantic” contexts.


High Courts cannot invoke inherent or writ powers to nullify valid convictions for serious crimes.


Judicial commentary must be confined to findings of fact and law, not sociological advice.


The State bears affirmative duties to rehabilitate and protect child victims under the Juvenile Justice Act.



📚 
Significance
Reinforces that sexual autonomy under 18 has no legal recognition under Indian criminal law.


Strengthens judicial discipline in judgment writing, rejecting subjective or moral reasoning.


Promotes victim rehabilitation through psychological and institutional support mechanisms.


Clarifies limits of Article 226 and Section 482 in criminal proceedings involving heinous offences.



🔗 
Key Precedents Referred
State of M.P. v. Laxmi Narayan (2019) – High Courts cannot quash convictions for serious offences based on compromise.


Independent Thought v. Union of India (2017) – Marital rape exception invalid for minors; consent of under-18 immaterial.


Subrata Chattoraj v. Union of India (2014) – Scope of High Court’s inherent powers.


Nipun Saxena v. Union of India (2019) – Privacy and dignity of sexual assault victims are integral to Article 21.



💬 
In Essence
The Supreme Court’s decision in In Re: Right to Privacy of Adolescents (2024) is a strong affirmation that:
Statutory protection of minors under POCSO cannot be diluted through notions of romantic consent;


Judicial discretion must remain disciplined, not moralistic; and


Victims’ welfare and rehabilitation are a constitutional and statutory responsibility of the State.


Here’s a comprehensive, CLAT PG–ready case summary based on the official Supreme Court judgment and the copyrighted material you provided.
This version retains accuracy, doctrinal clarity, and exam-level precision 👇

⚖️ 
CS-24-32 | In Re: Section 6A of the Citizenship Act, 1955 (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 789
Date of Judgment: 17 October 2024
Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud, Justices Surya Kant, M.M. Sundresh, J.B. Pardiwala, and Manoj Misra
Type: Constitution Bench (Five Judges)

📜 
Statutory & Constitutional Provisions
Citizenship Act, 1955 — Section 6A: Introduced by the 1985 Amendment to implement the Assam Accord, granting citizenship to migrants from Bangladesh under specified conditions.


Constitution of India


Article 6 & 7: Citizenship at the commencement of the Constitution.


Article 11: Power of Parliament to regulate citizenship by law.


Article 14: Right to equality.


Article 29(1): Protection of cultural and linguistic identity of minorities.


Article 326: Right to vote.


Article 355: Duty of the Union to protect states from external aggression and internal disturbance.



🧩 
Background
Following the 1971 Bangladesh Liberation War, Assam witnessed a mass influx of migrants across its porous border, causing demographic, political, and cultural tensions.
To address these concerns, the Assam Accord (15 August 1985) was signed between the Union Government and local protest groups.
To give legislative effect to the Accord, Section 6A was added to the Citizenship Act, 1955.
Before 1 January 1966 → Immigrants deemed Indian citizens.


Between 1 January 1966 – 24 March 1971 → Conditional citizenship after 10 years if:


Declared foreigner by tribunal,


Continuous residence in Assam, and


Temporary removal from electoral rolls.


Multiple petitions under Article 32 challenged Section 6A, alleging that it violated:
Articles 14 & 29(1) (unequal treatment and threat to indigenous culture),


Article 11 (Parliament’s overreach), and


Article 355 (Union’s failure to protect Assam from external aggression).


The case was referred to a Constitution Bench in 2014, finally decided in 2024.

⚖️ 
Issues Before the Court
Does Parliament have legislative competence to enact Section 6A under Articles 6, 7, and 11 of the Constitution?


Does Section 6A violate Article 14 (equality) or create arbitrary classifications?


Does it infringe Article 29(1) (cultural and linguistic rights of Assamese people)?


Does it undermine the Union’s duty under Article 355 to protect Assam from external aggression?


Does Section 6A unreasonably dilute citizenship norms and promote unlawful migration?



🧠 
Judgment Summary
Majority (4:1) — Justices Surya Kant, M.M. Sundresh, Manoj Misra, and CJI Chandrachud (concurring)
Dissent (1) — Justice J.B. Pardiwala

📘 
Majority Opinion (Justice Surya Kant for himself, Justices Sundresh & Misra)
1️⃣ 
Maintainability
Delay did not bar judicial review because the issue concerns constitutionality and public interest.


Courts may review laws affecting sovereignty and citizenship even decades later.


2️⃣ 
Conformity with Part II of the Constitution
Section 6A complements Articles 6 & 7, addressing citizenship for Indian-origin migrants affected by the 1971 war.


Articles 5–11 dealt only with citizenship at the commencement of the Constitution; subsequent citizenship lies within Parliament’s legislative power.


3️⃣ 
Parliament’s Legislative Competence
Parliament derives power from Article 246 read with Entry 17, List I (Union List) — “citizenship, naturalisation, and aliens.”


Hence, Parliament validly enacted Section 6A.


4️⃣ 
Article 14 — Classification Test
Section 6A applies exclusively to Assam due to its unique demographic and geopolitical situation.


Differential treatment is based on intelligible differentia (historical influx from Bangladesh) and rational nexus (implementing the Assam Accord).


Therefore, it does not violate Article 14.


5️⃣ 
Cut-off Dates Not Arbitrary
1 January 1966 and 24 March 1971 are rationally connected to historical and political milestones — inclusion in electoral rolls and formation of Bangladesh.


The term “ordinary residence” is sufficiently clear and contextually understood.


6️⃣ 
Cultural Rights (Article 29)
Assam’s distinct identity is protected through constitutional and statutory measures;


The problem lies in non-implementation, not in the legislation itself.


Section 6A, by providing mechanisms for detection and deportation, preserves, rather than undermines, local culture.


7️⃣ 
Article 355
The duty under Article 355 is directive, not enforceable, and does not confer a justiciable right.


Section 6A does not promote external aggression; rather, it regulates and limits citizenship to a specific timeframe.



👑 
Concurring Opinion (Chief Justice Chandrachud)
Reiterated that Parliament’s plenary power over citizenship under Article 11 extends to post-constitutional migrants.


Recognized Section 6A as a historically informed legislative compromise, balancing compassion and sovereignty.


Observed that greater administrative and institutional capacity is needed to implement the provision effectively, not repeal it.


Clarified that Article 355 does not create a fundamental right and cannot be used to invalidate legislation.



⚖️ 
Dissenting Opinion (Justice J.B. Pardiwala)
Declared Section 6A unconstitutional, citing procedural vagueness and lack of finality.


Flaws identified:


No fixed deadline for identifying eligible migrants.


Citizenship dependent on State-initiated reference to the Foreigners Tribunal, not voluntary application.


Ambiguous term “ordinary resident” could allow internal migration misuse.


Found Section 6A unreasonable and arbitrary under Article 14.


Invoked the “doctrine of prospective overruling”, declaring Section 6A invalid prospectively to prevent chaos among existing citizens.



🧠 
Directions Issued by the Court
Implement the directions from Sarbananda Sonowal v. Union of India (2005) — effective deportation of illegal immigrants post-1971.


Integrate the Immigrants (Expulsion from Assam) Act, 1950 with Section 6A for uniform enforcement.


Strengthen Foreigners Tribunals and administrative infrastructure to expedite identification and deportation.



💬 
Ratio Decidendi
Parliament has the authority to regulate citizenship through laws enacted under Article 11.


Section 6A is a valid classification grounded in historical and geopolitical realities unique to Assam.


Article 14 allows differential treatment if supported by intelligible differentia and rational nexus.


Article 355 is a duty provision, not a judicially enforceable right.


The remedy lies in effective implementation, not constitutional invalidation.



📚 
Key Precedents Referred
Case
Principle Reaffirmed
Sarbananda Sonowal v. Union of India (2005)
Directed detection and deportation of post-1971 illegal migrants.
RC Poudyal v. Union of India (1994)
Validated special treatment to states based on historical circumstances.
State of West Bengal v. Union of India (1963)
Federal balance—Parliament can legislate under its Union List competence.
Indra Sawhney v. Union of India (1992)
Classification test under Article 14.


📌 
Significance
Ends a decade-long constitutional stalemate on Section 6A’s validity.


Balances federalism, citizenship law, and indigenous rights.


Clarifies that citizenship regulation is a legislative function, not subject to judicial rewriting.


The dissent highlights tensions between compassion and constitutional identity, foreshadowing debates on migration and demographic balance.



🧭 
In Essence
The Constitution Bench in In Re: Section 6A of the Citizenship Act (2024) upheld Section 6A as a constitutionally valid and historically contextual provision.
It reaffirmed Parliament’s sovereign power over citizenship and rejected challenges based on equality, culture, and Union duty.
While the majority favored continuity and enforcement, Justice Pardiwala’s dissent warned that indefinite application of Section 6A risks constitutional arbitrariness and demographic imbalance in Assam.

⚖️ CS-24-33 | Indian Medical Association v. Union of India (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 693
Date of Judgment: 18 June 2024
Bench: Justice Hima Kohli and Justice Ahsanuddin Amanullah

📘 
Statutory & Constitutional Framework
Drugs and Magic Remedies (Objectionable Advertisements) Act, 1954 – Regulates misleading medical advertisements.


Consumer Protection Act, 1986 / 2019 – Ensures fair trade practices and prohibits deceptive advertising.


Food Safety and Standards Act, 2006 (FSSAI) – Regulates the quality and labeling of food products.


Cable Television Networks Rules, 1994 – Rule 7 – Mandates advertising code compliance and prohibits misleading ads.


Guidelines for Prevention of Misleading Advertisements and Endorsements, 2022 – Issued under Section 18 of the Consumer Protection Act.


Article 21, Constitution of India – Right to life includes the right to health and informed choice.



🧩 
Background
The Indian Medical Association (IMA) filed a writ petition against Patanjali Ayurved Ltd., alleging repeated dissemination of misleading and disparaging advertisements that falsely claimed allopathy and modern medicine were inferior to Ayurvedic treatments.
The case expanded beyond Patanjali’s conduct to examine misleading advertisements across the healthcare, food, and consumer goods sectors, focusing on regulatory failures and public accountability.

⚖️ 
Key Issues
Whether misleading advertisements violate the consumer’s right to health and informed choice under Article 21.


What are the responsibilities of manufacturers, advertisers, and endorsers in ensuring truthful, non-deceptive claims?


Whether the existing regulatory and self-regulatory mechanisms are sufficient to prevent misleading advertisements.


What should be the role of statutory bodies and ministries (AYUSH, FSSAI, I&B) in monitoring and enforcing advertising standards.



🧠 Arguments
🏛️ Petitioner (IMA)
Claimed misleading advertisements were endangering public health and exploiting consumer ignorance.


Celebrities and influencers endorsed untested or false health products without due diligence, violating the 2022 Guidelines.


Statutory regulators like FSSAI and the Ministry of AYUSH failed to act suo motu or address complaints effectively.


Misleading health claims violated Article 21, as the right to life includes the right to safe, informed healthcare choices.


Sought judicial intervention for a centralized monitoring mechanism and mandatory self-declaration of all ads.


⚖️ Respondent (Union of India, Ministry of AYUSH, Patanjali, et al.)
Contended that existing laws (Drugs & Magic Remedies Act, FSSAI Act, Consumer Protection Act) already provided adequate safeguards.


Claimed that self-regulation through industry bodies and advertising councils was sufficient.


Stated that the AYUSH sector required policy support, not over-regulation, to avoid stifling traditional medicine and economic growth.


Asserted ongoing reform efforts, including amendments to Rule 170 of the Drugs and Cosmetics Rules, 1945, to curb false claims.


Emphasized that advertisers should retain autonomy so long as they comply with legal frameworks.



🧾 
Judgment
The Supreme Court delivered a landmark ruling reinforcing public health, transparency, and consumer protection in advertising.
1️⃣ 
Right to Health under Article 21
The Court held that the right to health includes the right to be informed about the quality, composition, and effects of products consumed.


Misleading advertisements violate Article 21, as they deprive consumers of informed consent and safety.


2️⃣ 
Self-Declaration Requirement
Directed that before any advertisement is published, aired, or displayed, advertisers must submit a self-declaration certificate affirming compliance with all applicable laws.


This declaration must be uploaded on designated government portals:


Broadcast Seva Portal (for electronic media)


Press Council of India Portal (for print media).


This mechanism became operational on 18 June 2024, ensuring transparency and traceability.


3️⃣ 
Regulatory Accountability
Directed the Ministry of Information & Broadcasting (I&B) and the Ministry of AYUSH to coordinate for strict implementation.


Ordered enhanced monitoring by FSSAI and Central Consumer Protection Authority (CCPA) to verify claims in health-related ads.


4️⃣ 
Contempt Proceedings
Noting Patanjali’s continued dissemination of misleading claims despite earlier undertakings, the Court initiated contempt proceedings against:


Patanjali Ayurved Ltd.


Acharya Balkrishna (MD)


Baba Ramdev (Co-founder)


5️⃣ 
Stay on Omission of Rule 170
The Court stayed the Central Government’s decision to delete Rule 170 of the Drugs and Cosmetics Rules, 1945, which regulates misleading advertisements for Ayurvedic, Siddha, and Unani medicines.



📘 
Ratio Decidendi
Consumer’s right to health under Article 21 includes the right to truthful commercial information.


Advertisements are not absolute expressions under Article 19(1)(a); they are subject to reasonable restrictions under Article 19(2).


Manufacturers, endorsers, and advertising agencies owe a duty of care to ensure scientific accuracy and compliance with regulatory codes.


Misleading advertisements in health and food sectors directly infringe the fundamental right to life and dignity.


The state has a positive constitutional obligation to protect citizens from deceptive commercial practices.



🧩 
Important Precedents Referred
Case
Principle
Tata Press Ltd. v. Mahanagar Telephone Nigam Ltd. (1995)
Commercial speech is protected under Article 19(1)(a) but subject to reasonable restrictions.
Consumer Education & Research Centre v. Union of India (1995)
Right to health is integral to Article 21.
Hamdard Dawakhana v. Union of India (1960)
Misleading advertisements are not protected under Article 19(1)(a).
Common Cause v. Union of India (2018)
Public health is a matter of constitutional importance; state must prevent exploitation.


⚖️ 
Significance
Establishes constitutional recognition of consumers’ right to be informed about health and food products.


Creates a digital compliance ecosystem for advertisements through self-declaration portals.


Reinforces corporate accountability and endorsers’ liability.


Strengthens judicial oversight over deceptive medical and nutritional claims.


Balances AYUSH sector promotion with public safety obligations.



📌 In Essence
The Supreme Court in IMA v. Union of India (2024) expanded Article 21 to include the consumer’s right to accurate product information, making misleading health-related advertisements a violation of fundamental rights.
It mandated mandatory self-declarations, enhanced regulatory vigilance, and warned advertisers and endorsers that dishonest promotions will attract both statutory and contempt consequences.


📘 CS-24-34 | Javed Ahmad Hajam v. State of Maharashtra (2024)
📅 Citation: 2024 INSC 187 (7 March 2024)
⚖️ Bench: Justice Abhay S. Oka and Justice Ujjal Bhuyan

⚖️ Legal Provisions Involved
Section 153A, Indian Penal Code, 1860 – Punishment for promoting enmity between different groups on grounds of religion, race, place of birth, residence, language, etc.


Article 19(1)(a), Constitution of India – Freedom of speech and expression.


Article 19(2), Constitution of India – Permits reasonable restrictions on free speech in the interest of public order, morality, and sovereignty of India.



🧾 
Background
The appellant, a professor from Jammu & Kashmir teaching in Maharashtra, posted WhatsApp statuses criticising the abrogation of Article 370 and extending greetings to Pakistan on its Independence Day. His messages were:
“August 5 – Black Day Jammu & Kashmir”


“14th August – Happy Independence Day Pakistan”


“Article 370 was abrogated, we are not happy.”


An FIR was lodged under Section 153A IPC, alleging that these statements promoted disharmony and enmity among groups. The Bombay High Court refused to quash the FIR, following which the appellant approached the Supreme Court.

❓ 
Issues
Whether the WhatsApp status messages posted by the appellant constitute an offence under Section 153A of the Indian Penal Code, 1860.


What is the correct threshold for applying Section 153A IPC — does it require proof of deliberate and malicious intent to incite enmity between groups?


Whether expressions of dissent or goodwill toward another nation can be criminalised under Article 19(2) restrictions.



🧑‍⚖️ 
Decision
The Supreme Court quashed the FIR, holding that the appellant’s conduct did not meet the legal threshold of Section 153A IPC. His posts were mere expressions of political dissent, protected under Article 19(1)(a). The Court reaffirmed that criticism of government policies cannot be construed as promoting enmity or hatred.

💡 
Reasoning
Absence of Mens Rea: The Court ruled that intent to incite enmity or hatred is an essential ingredient under Section 153A. The appellant’s messages lacked any deliberate or malicious motive.


Freedom to Dissent: Peaceful criticism of governmental action, such as opposing the abrogation of Article 370, is a constitutionally protected right.


Reasonable Person Test: The impact of speech must be judged by the standard of a reasonable person, not by hypersensitive reactions of individuals intolerant to opposing views.


Goodwill Expression: Extending greetings to another country’s citizens, such as Pakistan, does not amount to disloyalty or sedition. It is a benign expression of goodwill that cannot attract criminal liability.



⚖️ 
Ratio Decidendi
For an offence under Section 153A IPC, the prosecution must prove:
The existence of a deliberate and malicious intent to promote enmity; and


A direct nexus between the words used and the likelihood of public disorder.

 Since neither element was satisfied, the FIR was unsustainable in law.



🧠 
Key Observations
“Every criticism of State action cannot be equated with disloyalty or hatred.”


“The Constitution protects not only agreeable speech but also the right to disagree.”


“Democracy thrives on dissent — criminalising it would destroy its foundation.”


“Criminal law must not become a weapon to silence political or ideological opposition.”



⚖️ 
Significance
The judgment reaffirms that peaceful dissent is not a crime. It narrows the application of Section 153A IPC to genuine cases involving malicious intent to provoke communal disharmony. It upholds the principle that free political expression lies at the heart of India’s constitutional democracy.

📚 
Important Precedents Referred
Shreya Singhal v. Union of India (2015): Struck down Section 66A IT Act; emphasised protection of online dissent.


Balwant Singh v. State of Punjab (1995): Held that slogans like “Khalistan Zindabad” without violence do not amount to sedition or hate speech.


Amish Devgan v. Union of India (2020): Clarified that intent and context are crucial in determining hate speech.


Maneka Gandhi v. Union of India (1978): Interpreted personal liberty and free speech as interdependent constitutional guarantees.



🏛️ 
Conclusion
The Supreme Court quashed the FIR against Professor Javed Ahmad Hajam, holding that his posts merely reflected political opinion and dissent. The judgment is a reaffirmation that democracy cannot exist without the right to disagree and that Section 153A IPC cannot be stretched to penalise lawful criticism or harmless expressions of belief.
🕊️ “In a democracy, the right to dissent is not sedition — it is the soul of liberty.”
Got it ✅ — you’ve provided two detailed (copyrighted + public-domain) reference drafts of Just Rights for Children Alliance v. S. Harish (2024 INSC 716).
Using both, I’ll now craft a copyright-free, authoritative, CLAT-PG-ready case summary in your standard format (no tables, emojis included, clear structure, concise yet analytical).

📘 CS-24-35 | Just Rights for Children Alliance v. S. Harish (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 716 (23 September 2024)
Bench: Chief Justice Dr. D.Y. Chandrachud and Justice J.B. Pardiwala

⚖️ 
Background
This case addressed whether merely viewing or possessing Child Sexual Exploitation and Abuse Material (CESAM)—commonly known as child pornography—constitutes a criminal offence under Indian law. The respondent, S. Harish, was accused of downloading and storing CESAM on his phone. The Madras High Court had quashed the criminal proceedings, holding that mere viewing without sharing or publishing such material was not punishable. The petitioner, an NGO working to combat child exploitation, appealed to the Supreme Court.

🧩 
Key Legal Questions
1️⃣ Whether viewing CESAM amounts to an offence under Section 15(1) of the Protection of Children from Sexual Offences Act, 2012 (POCSO) and Section 67B of the Information Technology Act, 2000.
2️⃣ What is the scope of “possession” under Section 15(1) of the POCSO Act — does it include temporary or constructive possession?
3️⃣ Whether the statutory presumption of culpable mental state under Section 30 of the POCSO Act can be invoked even at the quashing stage.

📜 
Relevant Legal Provisions
Section 15(1), POCSO Act: Punishes possession or storage of CESAM, and failure to delete, destroy, or report it.


Section 30, POCSO Act: Presumes a culpable mental state unless proved otherwise.


Section 67B, IT Act: Penalises creation, transmission, or viewing of sexually explicit material involving children.


Articles 15(3) and 39(e)-(f) of the Constitution: Direct the State to protect children from exploitation and abuse.



📂 
Facts of the Case
Police found CESAM files on the respondent’s phone following a digital forensic examination.


He admitted to watching pornography during college years, and two videos containing CESAM were retrieved.


The initial charge under Section 14(1) POCSO (use of children for pornography) was dropped, replaced by Section 15(1) for possession and failure to delete CESAM.


The Madras High Court quashed the proceedings, holding that mere viewing without sharing does not constitute an offence.


NGOs appealed, arguing that the High Court’s interpretation weakened the deterrence against child exploitation.



⚖️ 
Decision of the Supreme Court
The Supreme Court set aside the Madras High Court’s judgment and restored the criminal proceedings, ruling that:
Mere viewing or possession of CESAM is punishable under Section 15(1) POCSO if the material is not deleted or reported.


The act of viewing CESAM creates constructive possession and contributes to the demand chain of exploitation.


The presumption of culpable intent under Section 30 POCSO applies even at the quashing stage, ensuring the statutory intent of strict protection is upheld.


The expression “child pornography” must be replaced with “Child Sexual Exploitation and Abuse Material (CESAM),” which reflects the gravity and exploitative nature of the offence.



🧠 
Court’s Reasoning
🔹 1. Broad Interpretation of Possession:
The Court held that “possession” includes both actual and constructive control—viewing or streaming CESAM online constitutes possession if the individual has control over the device or account used.
🔹 2. Inchoate Crime Doctrine:
The Court classified the offence as an inchoate crime—acts preparatory to exploitation that facilitate the continuation of a harmful cycle of abuse.
🔹 3. Presumption of Intent (Section 30 POCSO):
Given the secretive nature of such offences, the law presumes a guilty intention once possession is established. This presumption can be rebutted at trial, not at the quashing stage.
🔹 4. Role of Intermediaries:
Online platforms cannot claim immunity under Section 79 IT Act unless they both remove the content and report it to the authorities.
🔹 5. Terminology Reform:
The Court directed the Union Government to replace the term “child pornography” with “CESAM” via amendment or ordinance to better capture the exploitative nature of the act.

🧾 
Judgment Summary
The Court revived the prosecution of S. Harish.


Viewing = Possession = Punishable under Section 15(1).


High Courts must apply the statutory presumption even during quashing.


The Union Government was directed to enable online reporting mechanisms for CESAM under the POCSO Act.



🔗 
Referred / Related Cases & Their Significance
1️⃣ Independent Thought v. Union of India (2017): Reinforced child-centric interpretation of POCSO provisions.
2️⃣ Attorney General for India v. Satish (2021): Reaffirmed liberal and protective interpretation of child abuse laws.
3️⃣ Nupur Ghatge v. State of Madhya Pradesh (2020): Clarified scope of Section 67B IT Act in penalising viewing or transmission of CESAM.

💡 
Significance
This judgment redefines the legal approach to child sexual exploitation online. It bridges the gap between technological conduct (viewing/streaming) and physical possession, strengthens prosecutorial mechanisms under POCSO, and upholds India’s constitutional commitment to protect children from all forms of abuse.
⚖️ “Viewing the suffering of a child for gratification is not passive; it is participation.” — Supreme Court of India

📘 CS-24-36 | Jyoti Devi v. Suket Hospital & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 492 (Bench: Justice Sanjay Karol and Justice Aravind Kumar)

⚖️ 
Background
This case concerns a medical negligence claim filed by Jyoti Devi, a patient who endured prolonged pain after an appendectomy due to a surgical needle left inside her abdomen. The Supreme Court examined not only the liability of the hospital but also the application of the “Eggshell Skull Rule” and the principle of just and fair compensation under the Consumer Protection Act, 1986.
The appellant sought enhancement of compensation, alleging that the lower fora had undervalued her suffering and medical expenses. The Supreme Court restored the higher compensation originally granted by the District Forum.

🧩 
Key Legal Questions
1️⃣ Whether the Eggshell Skull Rule applied in determining compensation in this case of medical negligence.
2️⃣ Whether the compensation awarded by the consumer forums was just, fair, and proportionate to the degree of injury and suffering caused by the hospital’s negligence.

📜 
Relevant Legal Framework
Section 12, Consumer Protection Act, 1986 — Enables consumers to file complaints for deficiency in medical service.


Eggshell Skull Rule (Common Law Doctrine): A defendant must “take the victim as they find them” and remains liable even if the plaintiff’s pre-existing vulnerability exacerbates the injury.


Principle of Restitutio in Integrum: Compensation must restore the injured party, as far as money can, to the position they would have been in had the injury not occurred.



📂 
Facts of the Case
Jyoti Devi underwent an appendicitis surgery at Suket Hospital in Himachal Pradesh.


Post-surgery, she continued to experience acute abdominal pain for nearly four years.


Multiple consultations and treatments failed to identify the cause of pain.


Later, at PGIMER, Chandigarh, it was discovered that a 2.5 cm surgical needle had been left inside her abdomen.


A second surgery was performed to remove the foreign object.


She filed a complaint alleging gross medical negligence and sought ₹19,80,000 in compensation.


Consumer Forum History:
🏛️ District Forum: Awarded ₹5,00,000 compensation.


⚖️ State Commission: Reduced to ₹1,00,000.


🏛️ National Commission: Enhanced to ₹2,00,000, invoking the Eggshell Skull Rule.


⚖️ Supreme Court: Restored the District Forum’s award of ₹5,00,000 and clarified the correct application of the rule.



⚖️ 
Judgment
The Supreme Court allowed the appeal, restoring the District Forum’s award of ₹5,00,000 and rejecting the reasoning of the SCDRC and NCDRC.
The Court held that the Eggshell Skull Rule was misapplied, as there was no evidence of any pre-existing vulnerability in the appellant.


The presence of a foreign surgical object inside a patient’s body is prima facie proof of negligence, and liability arises irrespective of subjective conditions.


The Court reiterated that compensation in medical negligence must be fair, reasonable, and based on restorative justice principles.



🧠 
Court’s Reasoning
🔹 1. Proof of Negligence:
Leaving a foreign object inside the patient’s body after surgery constitutes res ipsa loquitur — the act speaks for itself — and establishes negligence without requiring additional proof.
🔹 2. Limits of the Eggshell Skull Rule:
The doctrine applies only where the victim had a known pre-existing vulnerability that worsened the injury. Since no such evidence existed in this case, the Court held that the principle was wrongly invoked by the NCDRC.
🔹 3. Fair and Adequate Compensation:
The Supreme Court emphasized that consumer fora must ensure compensation reflects both physical pain and mental suffering, applying the principle of restitutio in integrum. Reduction of compensation without valid reasoning violates this standard.
🔹 4. Institutional Responsibility:
Hospitals are under a non-delegable duty of care to ensure post-operative checks and proper accounting of surgical instruments, irrespective of the attending doctor’s personal fault.

🧾 
Final Holding
Negligence Proven: The hospital was found guilty of a clear breach of duty.


Compensation Restored: ₹5,00,000 reinstated as awarded by the District Forum.


Clarification: The Eggshell Skull Rule applies narrowly and cannot justify arbitrary compensation reductions.



🔗 
Referred / Related Cases
1️⃣ Sarla Verma v. DTC (2009) 6 SCC 121 – Established principles for fair and uniform computation of compensation.
2️⃣ N. Chandrababu Naidu v. Union of India (2023) – Referred for delineating liability in cases involving multiple medical institutions.
3️⃣ Jacob Mathew v. State of Punjab (2005) 6 SCC 1 – Defined the standard of medical negligence as failure to exercise reasonable skill expected of a competent professional.
4️⃣ Indian Medical Association v. V.P. Shantha (1995) 6 SCC 651 – Brought medical services within the ambit of the Consumer Protection Act.
5️⃣ Spring Meadows Hospital v. Harjol Ahluwalia (1998) 4 SCC 39 – Imposed vicarious liability on hospitals for staff negligence.

💡 
Significance
This judgment reinforces patient safety and the principle of accountability in healthcare. It draws a fine line between ordinary negligence and gross negligence, while clarifying that compensation must neither be excessive nor symbolic — but just, reasoned, and restorative.
⚖️ “The measure of compensation in negligence is not generosity, but justice.”

Excellent — here’s the final, copyright-free, CLAT-PG–ready version of the case summary for

📘 CS-24-37 | Kolkata Municipal Corporation & Anr. v. Bimal Kumar Shah & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 544 (26 July 2024)
Bench: Justice P.S. Narasimha and Justice Aravind Kumar

⚖️ 
Background
This case is a significant pronouncement on the limits of municipal authority, due process in property acquisition, and the scope of Article 300A of the Constitution, which protects an individual’s right to property.
The dispute arose when the Kolkata Municipal Corporation (KMC) sought to forcibly acquire private property for a public purpose—ostensibly to construct a park—without following the statutory procedure under the Kolkata Municipal Corporation Act, 1980.
The respondent, Bimal Kumar Shah, alleged that his property was unlawfully taken over, and his ownership was replaced with that of the corporation in the official land records. Both the trial court and the High Court ruled against the Corporation, leading to an appeal before the Supreme Court.

🧩 
Key Legal Issues
1️⃣ Whether the Kolkata Municipal Corporation can acquire private land under Section 352 of the KMC Act, 1980 without following due procedure.
2️⃣ Whether the unauthorised acquisition and alteration of ownership records violates Article 300A of the Constitution, which mandates that deprivation of property must be “by authority of law.”

📜 
Relevant Legal Provisions
Article 300A, Constitution of India — “No person shall be deprived of his property save by authority of law.”


Section 352, Kolkata Municipal Corporation Act, 1980 — Power of the Municipal Commissioner to acquire land for public purposes.


Section 537, KMC Act, 1980 — Procedure to be followed when immovable property cannot be acquired by agreement, requiring prior sanction of the State Government.



📂 
Facts of the Case
The Kolkata Municipal Corporation attempted to take possession of the respondent’s property under Section 352 of the KMC Act, claiming it was needed for a public park.


The Corporation deleted the respondent’s name as owner from official municipal records and substituted its own name.


The respondent filed a writ petition before the Calcutta High Court, seeking a stay on the acquisition and restoration of his ownership records.


The trial court held that Section 352 does not confer compulsory acquisition powers, which must follow procedures under Section 537.


The High Court affirmed this finding, directing that the respondent’s ownership be restored.


The Corporation appealed to the Supreme Court, asserting that its actions were in accordance with the law.



⚖️ 
Arguments
Petitioner (Kolkata Municipal Corporation):
Claimed statutory authority under Section 352 to acquire property for public purposes such as constructing parks or public utilities.


Contended that the High Court erred in holding that Section 537 was the exclusive provision for acquisition.


Cited State of Kerala v. T.M. Peter (1980) to argue that varying compensation frameworks across acquisition laws do not violate Article 14.


Asserted that the action was undertaken in good faith and did not infringe constitutional rights.


Respondent (Bimal Kumar Shah):
Argued that the forcible acquisition without due process violated Article 300A, which guarantees the right to property.


Emphasized that no prior notice, hearing, or compensation was provided.


Relied on Nagpur Improvement Trust v. Vithal Rao (1973), which held that acquisition must strictly adhere to statutory and constitutional safeguards.


Contended that the Corporation’s unilateral alteration of records was illegal, arbitrary, and mala fide.



⚖️ 
Judgment
The Supreme Court dismissed the appeal and upheld the High Court’s decision, declaring that the Corporation’s acquisition was illegal, arbitrary, and unconstitutional.
The Court held that:
Section 352 does not empower the Municipal Commissioner to forcibly acquire property; the procedure under Section 537, requiring State Government approval, must be followed.


The unauthorised change in ownership records violated the constitutional mandate under Article 300A.


Property rights, though no longer fundamental, remain protected constitutional rights, and deprivation without lawful procedure is impermissible.


The Court imposed a cost of ₹5,00,000 on the Corporation for its illegal exercise of power.



🧠 
Court’s Reasoning
🔹 1. Scope of Section 352:
Section 352 allows land acquisition only for specified purposes, not forcible occupation. Any exercise of acquisition power without statutory authority amounts to usurpation of property.
🔹 2. Violation of Article 300A:
The right to property can be restricted only by authority of law, meaning a legislative procedure backed by procedural fairness. Arbitrary administrative actions cannot qualify.
🔹 3. Role of Section 537:
Section 537 mandates that where voluntary acquisition fails, the Commissioner must apply to the State Government for authorization. The Corporation’s failure to do so rendered the acquisition void.
🔹 4. Substantive Rights under Article 300A:
The Court identified a cluster of procedural rights implicit in Article 300A, which must guide all property-related state actions:
🧾 Right to Notice


🗣️ Right to be Heard


🧑‍⚖️ Right to a Reasoned Decision


🏗️ Duty to Acquire Only for a Public Purpose


💰 Right to Restitution or Fair Compensation


⚖️ Right to an Efficient and Expeditious Process


📜 Right to Conclusion — finality of proceedings


🔹 5. Accountability of Public Authorities:
The Court emphasized that public bodies are trustees of public power and cannot appropriate private property arbitrarily under the guise of “public purpose.” The doctrine of constitutional morality requires transparency, fairness, and lawful conduct in every administrative action.

🧾 
Final Holding
The appeal by KMC was dismissed.


The respondent’s ownership was restored, and KMC was directed to pay ₹5,00,000 as costs.


The Court reaffirmed that Article 300A guarantees more than a procedural right—it embodies a substantive right to lawful, fair, and reasoned deprivation.



🔗 
Referred / Related Cases
1️⃣ Nagpur Improvement Trust v. Vithal Rao (1973) 1 SCC 500 – Acquisition without fair procedure violates constitutional equality.
2️⃣ State of Kerala v. T.M. Peter (1980) 3 SCC 554 – Different compensation schemes under various statutes do not necessarily violate Article 14.
3️⃣ K.T. Plantation Pvt. Ltd. v. State of Karnataka (2011) 9 SCC 1 – Article 300A safeguards property as a constitutional right subject to due process.
4️⃣ State of U.P. v. Manohar (2005) 2 SCC 126 – Arbitrary deprivation of property by state officials is unconstitutional.
5️⃣ Hindustan Petroleum Corp. Ltd. v. Darius Shapur Chenai (2005) 7 SCC 627 – Strict compliance with acquisition procedure is mandatory.

💡 
Significance
This judgment fortifies the constitutional right to property under Article 300A, clarifying that even municipal or local authorities are bound by due process. It reinforces the judiciary’s role in curbing administrative arbitrariness and expands the jurisprudence on procedural fairness in property acquisition.
⚖️ “Public purpose cannot justify private injustice — no authority can bypass the due process of law under the guise of urgency.” — Supreme Court of India

📘 CS-24-38 | Lalu Yadav v. State of Uttar Pradesh & Ors. (2024)
Citation: 2024 INSC 782 (18 September 2024)
Bench: Justice C.T. Ravikumar and Justice Rajesh Bindal

⚖️ Background
This case examines whether a long-term consensual relationship followed by an unfulfilled promise of marriage can attract criminal liability under Sections 376 (rape) and 313 (causing miscarriage without consent) of the Indian Penal Code (IPC). It also considers the scope of the High Court’s powers under Article 226 of the Constitution and Section 482 of the Code of Criminal Procedure (CrPC) to quash criminal proceedings that appear to be an abuse of process.
The complainant alleged that the appellant, Lalu Yadav, engaged in a physical relationship with her over several years, assuring marriage, and later pressured her to terminate her pregnancies. The FIR was lodged five years after the alleged incidents. The appellant sought quashing of the FIR, arguing that the relationship was consensual, mutually sustained, and known to both families.

🧩 
Key Issues
1️⃣ Whether a prolonged consensual relationship, based on a promise of marriage that was later unfulfilled, can constitute rape under Section 376 IPC.
2️⃣ Whether Section 313 IPC (causing miscarriage without consent) can apply when the complainant’s own statement does not indicate absence of consent.
3️⃣ Whether the High Court erred in refusing to exercise its powers under Article 226 or Section 482 CrPC to quash the FIR, despite the absence of coercion or deception.

📜 
Relevant Provisions
Section 376, IPC – Punishment for rape.


Section 313, IPC – Causing miscarriage without consent.


Article 226, Constitution of India – Power of High Courts to issue writs.


Section 482, CrPC – Inherent powers of the High Court to prevent abuse of process and secure ends of justice.



📂 
Facts of the Case
The complainant alleged that the appellant entered into a sexual relationship with her over several years, promising marriage.


When her family discovered the relationship, the appellant reassured them of his intent to marry but later withdrew his promise.


She further claimed that he compelled her to undergo abortions during the relationship.


The FIR was filed five years after the alleged incidents, following the appellant’s eventual refusal to marry.


The appellant filed a writ petition under Article 226 before the High Court, asserting that the relationship was consensual and that the complaint was retaliatory.


The High Court declined to quash the FIR, prompting the appellant to appeal to the Supreme Court.



⚖️ 
Judgment
The Supreme Court quashed the FIR and all related criminal proceedings. The Court held that the allegations reflected a consensual relationship, not one vitiated by coercion or fraud sufficient to invoke Section 376 IPC. It emphasized that criminal law cannot be used to punish failed relationships or emotional disputes where mutual consent existed throughout.

🧠 
Court’s Reasoning
🔹 1. Absence of Coercion or Deception:
The Court observed that both parties had maintained a voluntary relationship for several years. There was no evidence that the complainant’s consent was obtained through deceit or coercion at the inception of the relationship — a key element under Section 376 IPC.
🔹 2. Delay in Filing FIR:
The five-year delay in lodging the complaint was unexplained and undermined the credibility of the allegations. The Court noted that while delay alone does not nullify a complaint, it weakens the evidentiary foundation when the relationship was openly maintained and consensual.
🔹 3. Section 313 IPC Inapplicable:
The complainant’s statements indicated voluntary medical termination of pregnancy. Since lack of consent is an essential element under Section 313 IPC, the provision could not apply.
🔹 4. Application of Bhajan Lal Principles:
Referring to State of Haryana v. Bhajan Lal (1992 Supp (1) SCC 335), the Court reaffirmed that FIRs should be quashed where allegations are inherently improbable, absurd, or filed to settle personal scores. The allegations in this case fell squarely within those parameters.
🔹 5. Inherent Powers under Section 482 CrPC:
The Court reiterated that inherent jurisdiction must be exercised to prevent abuse of legal process and protect individuals from frivolous criminal prosecution. Where consensual relationships are later reinterpreted as coercive merely due to personal differences, continuation of criminal proceedings constitutes such abuse.

🧾 
Final Holding
The FIR and all consequential proceedings were quashed.


The Court declared that consensual relationships, even when followed by emotional fallout or unfulfilled marriage promises, cannot be criminalized as rape unless deception existed from the very beginning.


The Court reaffirmed that delay, mutual consent, and absence of coercion are critical factors in determining criminal culpability.



🔗 
Important Cases Referred
1️⃣ State of Haryana v. Bhajan Lal (1992) – Enumerated circumstances under which an FIR can be quashed to prevent abuse of process.
2️⃣ Shivashankar alias Shiva v. State of Karnataka (2019) – Held that long-term consensual relationships cannot automatically translate into rape charges upon refusal of marriage.
3️⃣ XXXX v. State of Madhya Pradesh (2024) – Clarified that sustained mutual consent negates the elements of rape under Section 376 IPC.
4️⃣ Pramod Suryabhan Pawar v. State of Maharashtra (2019) – Explained that a false promise of marriage amounts to rape only if deceit exists at the inception.
5️⃣ Deepak Gulati v. State of Haryana (2013) – Distinguished between breach of promise and false promise made to manipulate consent.

💡 
Significance
This ruling strengthens jurisprudence on the misuse of Section 376 IPC in romantic or intimate disputes, emphasizing that criminal law must not intrude into consensual private relationships. It reinforces judicial discipline under Section 482 CrPC, ensuring that criminal proceedings serve justice rather than vengeance.
⚖️ “Consent freely given in a relationship of mutual affection cannot be retrospectively converted into coercion merely due to emotional rupture.” — Supreme Court of India


CS-24-39 | Legal Consequences Arising from the Policies and Practices of Israel in the Occupied Palestinian Territory, Including East Jerusalem (2024)

⚖️ Bench
International Court of Justice (ICJ) — Advisory Opinion, delivered on 19 July 2024

📜 Relevant Provisions
Article 96, UN Charter – Power of the General Assembly to request advisory opinions from the ICJ.


Hague Regulations, 1907 and Fourth Geneva Convention, 1949 – Rules on occupation and protection of civilians.


Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Racial Discrimination (CERD) – Prohibition of discriminatory practices.


Right to Self-Determination (Jus Cogens) – Fundamental, non-derogable principle under international law.


Jus ad Bellum – Prohibition on acquisition of territory by force.



🏛️ Background
The United Nations General Assembly (December 2022) requested an advisory opinion from the ICJ on the legal consequences of Israel’s policies and practices in the Occupied Palestinian Territory (OPT), including East Jerusalem.
The request covered several areas:
Israel’s occupation, settlement construction, and annexation activities;


Discriminatory laws and movement restrictions;


Land confiscation and home demolitions;


Failure to protect Palestinian civilians from settler violence.


Israel filed a written statement but did not participate in oral hearings, while multiple States and international organizations submitted interventions.

❓ Key Issues
Whether Israel’s continued presence in the Occupied Palestinian Territory is lawful under international law.


Whether settlement expansion, annexation, and discriminatory measures violate international humanitarian and human rights law.


What legal consequences arise for Israel, other States, and international organizations, including obligations of cessation, non-recognition, non-assistance, and reparation.



⚖️ Court’s Analysis
The Court reaffirmed that the Occupied Palestinian Territory remains under belligerent occupation, and Israel’s activities — including settlements, annexation, land confiscation, and movement restrictions — violate international humanitarian law, human rights law, and the Palestinian people’s right to self-determination.


Settlements and annexation constitute de facto sovereignty and permanent demographic alteration, which are incompatible with the temporary nature of occupation.


Israel’s presence has thus become unlawful, and it must withdraw completely and cease all activities that perpetuate the occupation.


All States and international organizations have erga omnes obligations not to recognize or aid in maintaining this unlawful situation.


The Court emphasized the duty of the UN to take effective measures to ensure compliance and restoration of Palestinian rights.



🧾 Judgment / Findings
Israel’s continued occupation of the OPT is unlawful under international law.


Israel must:


End its presence immediately,


Cease all settlement activity,


Evacuate settlers, and


Provide reparations for the harm caused to Palestinians.


All States must:


Not recognize or assist the unlawful situation,


Refrain from any acts implying legitimization of Israel’s control, and


Cooperate to ensure compliance with international obligations.


The United Nations should take appropriate institutional measures to bring the unlawful situation to an end.



💡 Significance
Reaffirms that self-determination is a jus cogens norm, violation of which entails universal legal responsibility.


Clarifies the duties of third States — including India — in cases of prolonged occupation and annexation.


Establishes a clear distinction between lawful occupation and unlawful annexation under international law.


Strengthens the ICJ’s evolving jurisprudence on State responsibility, human rights, and non-recognition obligations.



CS-24-40 | Manish Sisodia v. Directorate of Enforcement (2024 INSC 595)

⚖️ 
Bench
Justice B.R. Gavai and Justice K.V. Viswanathan

📜 
Background
This case arises from allegations of corruption and money laundering in relation to the Delhi Excise Policy 2021–22. The appellant, Manish Sisodia, then Deputy Chief Minister of Delhi, was accused of manipulating the excise policy to extend undue benefits to private entities in exchange for kickbacks.
Following a letter by the Lieutenant Governor of Delhi, the Ministry of Home Affairs initiated an inquiry, leading to a CBI FIR and a parallel Enforcement Directorate (ED) case under the Prevention of Money Laundering Act, 2002 (PMLA).
Sisodia was arrested first by the CBI (February 2023) and later by the ED (March 2023). The CBI filed a charge sheet under Sections 7, 7A, 8, and 12 of the Prevention of Corruption Act, 1988 read with Sections 420, 201, and 120B of the Indian Penal Code, 1860. The ED followed with a complaint under Section 3 of the PMLA.
After two rounds of bail rejections by the Delhi High Court, Sisodia appealed to the Supreme Court, contending that continued incarceration violated his fundamental right to liberty under Article 21.

⚖️ 
Relevant Provisions
Article 21, Constitution of India – Right to life and personal liberty.


Section 439, Code of Criminal Procedure, 1973 – Power of High Court to grant bail.


Sections 7, 7A, 8, 12, Prevention of Corruption Act, 1988.


Sections 420, 201, 120B, Indian Penal Code, 1860.


Sections 3 and 45, Prevention of Money Laundering Act, 2002.



🧩 
Key Issue
Whether the right to bail can be read into Section 45 of the PMLA when the accused has spent a long period in custody and there is a significant delay in trial proceedings.

⚖️ 
Arguments
Appellant (Sisodia):
The trial involved 493 witnesses and more than one lakh pages of documents, making early conclusion impossible.


Continued incarceration without commencement of trial violated Article 21 and amounted to punishment without conviction.


The investigation had concluded, and most evidence was documentary, minimizing any risk of tampering.


The twin conditions of Section 45 PMLA should be relaxed in cases of prolonged custody to protect constitutional liberty.


Respondent (Enforcement Directorate):
Sisodia was a highly influential public official capable of influencing witnesses and obstructing justice.


The delay in trial was partly caused by the defence filing multiple applications.


Bail should not be granted unless the twin conditions under Section 45 were satisfied.



⚖️ 
Judgment
The Supreme Court allowed the appeal, quashing the Delhi High Court’s order and granting bail to Manish Sisodia in both CBI and ED cases.
The Court observed that:
There was “not even a remotest possibility” of the trial being concluded soon given the massive volume of evidence and 495 witnesses.


To keep the appellant in custody indefinitely “would result in a grave violation of the right to personal liberty under Article 21.”


The right to bail must be read into Section 45 of the PMLA when prolonged incarceration and delay in trial are not attributable to the accused.


The appellant had “deep roots in society” and was not a flight risk. Conditions could be imposed to prevent interference with the investigation.


The Court reiterated that “bail is the rule and jail is the exception”, cautioning lower courts against treating pre-trial detention as punitive.



⚖️ 
Ratio Decidendi
When there is inordinate delay in trial and the accused has spent substantial time in custody, the constitutional guarantee of personal liberty under Article 21 overrides the statutory rigour of Section 45 PMLA. The Court emphasized that prolonged detention without trial amounts to punishment before conviction, which is impermissible.

📚 
Important Precedents Referred
Ramkripal Meena v. Directorate of Enforcement (2024) – Relaxed Section 45 twin conditions due to prolonged custody and delayed trial.


Vijay Madanlal Choudhary v. Union of India (2022) – Upheld Section 45 PMLA but recognized Article 21 safeguards.


Satender Kumar Antil v. CBI (2022) – Affirmed that the right to speedy trial is part of Article 21.


Gudikanti Narasimhulu v. Public Prosecutor (1978) – Bail should not be withheld as punishment.


Prabir Purkayastha v. State (NCT of Delhi) (2024) – Reiterated that life and liberty are sacrosanct rights under Article 21.



🧭 
Conclusion
The Supreme Court granted regular bail to Manish Sisodia, setting a precedent that constitutional liberty under Article 21 must guide the interpretation of special statutes like PMLA, particularly where the trial is unreasonably delayed.
The Court’s decision reaffirmed that detention cannot substitute for punishment and underscored that procedural law must serve justice, not obstruct it.